I’ve written down my plan for May in my oversized calendar, allocating chapters to each day. Monday was easy, since it was reviewing two older chapters I revised just before I went on holidays. Tuesday was about writing a brand new chapter.. this is where things got a bit sticky. With the constant self-made distractions, I managed to get on paper just under 1000 words – though they are very rough. Still, it’s progress. I figure since I’ve allocated no chapters to myself for the weekend, I can revise it then, and continue with my plan. Maybe if I keep pushing myself forward, I’ll get back into my momentum… Sure hope so.
i vow to not compare myself to anyone else.
What does this have to do with getting rid of my stuff you ask? Well, they both make my head hurt! Decisions, decisions! What goes, where does it go, and how does it get there? Should I eat this year or fill up the fuel tanks?
Earlier during a press conference in Parliament, Wanita PKR chief Zuraida Kamaruddin said Najib’s refusal to strip Shahrizat of the Wanita Umno chief post would help PR prove his weak leadership to Malaysians.
1/4 cup chopped peanuts
13. Ricetta Amorosa (01:17)
After non-Hispanic White Americans, Hispanics or Latino Americans constitute the second largest ethnic group in the United States. This is because just like Hispanics and Latino Americans, White Americans are composed of many sub groups! In fact, since 1565 people of Hispanic or Latino Heritage have been continuously present in what is now the United States. Today that presence is about 16.3% of the total population of the United States which translates to over 50 million consumers.
For over 85 years, The Walt Disney Studios has been the basis on which to build The Walt Disney Company (DIS: NYSE). Today, the study makes movies, music and theater quality for consumers around the world. The films are made under four labels: Walt Disney Pictures, which includes Walt Disney Animation Studios and Pixar Animation Studios, Disneynature, Touchstone Pictures and Marvel. The original music and soundtracks of the films are produced by Disney Records and Hollywood Records, while Disney Theatrical Group produces and licenses live events, including Broadway theatrical productions, Disney on Ice and Disney LIVE!. For more information please visit www.disney.com.
Alex Counts, President and CEO of Grameen Foundation, includes the following from the foreword:
Hello! Last week I was sent a few emails and also received recent comments on my July post from several very kind and thoughtful bloggers who were wondering how I was getting on.
These are the women who have lost their own thoughts, their own voices, their own independence, after years of unending verbal and or physical abuse. These women become the doormats of overpowering male bastards who want nothing more than to dominate and control.
No father no mother she’s just like the other
Round 4 – Burpees & pike ups (no weight)
What can farmers do about this situation? Please leave a comment if you have an opinion.
Help me, Lord, to never take this lavish gift for granted, but to bow my heart, my mind and my knee to You in forever gratitude every single day of this life.
I feel guilty, but I dread 3pm every day. I start a countdown in my head the minute he gets home until bedtime, and repeatedly tell myself "only 5 more hours... only 3 more hours..." until finally I can send him to bed and relax again.
“Every year, AMAA wears a cloth of Pan-Africanism,” Head of the College of Screeners Shaibu Hussein told me on the eve of the Awards in 2011. “We don’t touch films with low production values.”
I must admit I don't know if this has done me any good or not! I can plainly see how much I've improved with the colouring, but has my basic card style changed?? Hmmm, I'm not sure. I do dabble with flowers, flourishes and frilly things as you can see but I tend to go right back to square, paper, ribbon and image pretty quickly!!
Even if nationalism began to re-adopt its true position I fear that it might already be too late, given that the aim was to piggyback this creed surreptitiously into the mainstream upon the back of public anger, anger that the Nu-right latched onto in order to garner the vote. Of course job done the right is of little use, the BNP has fallen into disarray with one faction or the other vying for attention. Mr Griffin keeps endeavouring to remind everyone of how well he has done whilst disparaging other parties or groups in the process, individuals and groups each seek the jugular whilst in truth none have anything to bring to the table. It matters little the squabble as the electorate have comprehensively rejected the fringe right and conservatism in the old sense has gone the way of the dodo, today there is a new political order and all groups be it we nationalists, the left or any other must realise that we have permitted the complete and utter subversion of the vote and it is now meaningless. In the meantime the war for Zion will continue, both in a physical sense in Afghanistan and in an intellectual and ideological sense in other spheres, the right within Europe will still advocate an anti-Islamic position, believing that it is a route to power whilst the real power has already been grabbed and we the right and indeed all sides of the political spectrum were too blind to see it.
Hermel searched diligently for the secret door, but to no avail. He could not find any kind of latch to open the door.
Self-organising systems that learn and evolve based on feedback loops, utilising local interactions, attractors and no visible hierachical structure. I wonder if it is more likely for ‘systems’ at the ‘edge of chaos’ to exhibit these evolutionary, emergent behaviours and characteristics.
1 cup mayonnaise
and the pearl is from Kutt Ut.
Last year was a difficult one for me.
Beer Braised Smoked Chicken Breast
even the sturdy might quake and quail
Birch*
Norma hugged him tightly and quickly before leaving with her husband. With his back to the window, DJ blocked off the other world and stood over the bed. The head was raised just enough to make Meg comfortable but not enough to hurt her stomach. Carefully, DJ slid his fingers under hers and ran his thumb over her knuckles. So limp.
Dress: Jim Hjelm
Zoya Coraline
First up, an admission: this is the second version of this post I've had to write. That's because Blogger, as is sometimes its wont, went off the deep end just as I was putting the finishing touches to the original version and deleted the entire draft. Consequently, and despite much furious keyboard bashing and fruitless back-searching, I lost the lot, which was, and continues to be, really, really annoying, particularly as I was rather pleased with that version. Although, now I come to think of it, there might be a proverb about that; something about pride and falling over. I dunno; I'm too furious to contemplate it right now. Anyway, I can only apologise if this post is a bit sub-par – I mean, more sub-par than normal. If it's any consolation, it was written with steam coming out of my fucking ears.
You get the idea?
Another unlikely table that has recently become one of Paris' hottest tables is the joint venture between Thierry Costes and former two star Crillon chef Jean-François Piege, Thoumieux. The old 1920's brasserie located in the chic seventh had been flagging in recent years, and Piege's redesign of both the dining room and update of the classic French menu (with additions such as the pizza soufflé and "carbonara" of calimari) have pleased diners as much as the reasonable prices. The upcoming renovation of the hotel and his future upstairs chef's table , (perhaps) called "Le Piege", will, according to rumours serve anywhere from 8 to 25 lucky diners. We'll see in a couple months.
I suppose what the viewer at home is expected to take from the programme is entertainment value of the end product and how it looks, considering the ingredients involved. However, that fell on its hole in one episode where a recipe consisted of seal's blubber or some such and he substituted it for duck's liver...so what's the point at all? None of the meals are practical to recreate at home and listening to the hateful, ball-licking guests swooning over the meal as if each course represented the second coming of one part of the holy trinity.
Rob Ryan’s romantic screen print of a bottle filled with Tears I cried over you 1981-9 is at one end of the scale – and a giclée print by Reuben Dangoor, of Being a Dickhead’s Cool Youtube fame, entitled: Red Beard’s Break-up – an illustrated scene with a more sinister edge – is at the other end.
Someday, I’ll post something a little more detailed about the insanity of Spanish names (those born post-Franco are especially worth discussing), but for the time being, there’s a thing from a story about US visa rule changes that made me laugh. The key word here is “common.”
(Added a few notes in parenthesis, made some minor revisions).
“No Apologies“
So, the other evening, we were eating take-out Chinese. At the end of the meal, Child #4 (11 year-old daughter) cracks open her fortune cookie and reads it to herself.
And lead us not into temptation,
LOL~
Perhaps that is why you cannot mourn for them all at once, and that is okay.
A day disguised as any day,
Eat a salad each day + no creamy dressings. (We buy a huge container of organic mixed greens at Costco every other week and eat salads quite a bit already throughout the week. This should, hopefully, be an easy goal for me to hit even with my busy schedule right now.)
Thanks for your time to read my email . We are in the market of Stone Sculpture products in china. (Oh great, two of the things I have never had a proclivity towards; Stone Sculpture and... wait a minute: do you mean China as in the county or china as in your best cups and saucers...?)
We went to church for a shortened meeting to take the sacrament and get the news today. All members of the branch have been accounted for and we've heard that all the missionaries in Japan are accounted for also. (Big relief.)
Loss and Gain
- Pit beef sandwiches - a local staple. It's thinly cut grilled top round (beef), traditionally served with "tiger sauce" (horseradish sauce) and thinly sliced raw onions on a kaiser roll. Most famous is probably Chap's BBQ (it's been on "Diners, Drive-Ins, and Dives" and "Man v. Food"), but we think Pioneer is slightly better (although it's outside the city in Woodlawn). They give you a slice of warm beef to snack on as you wait in line, which definitely contributed to their ranking as "favorite." Read about our pit beef experiences here and here.
Included in the price is a premium open bar. So, I had to have a few of their mai tai’s. They were very good. Randy took care of our table and made sure everyone had plenty of drinks.
Now, before you leap off to check it out, thinking you'll be inundated with short satisfying stories filled to the brim with graphic sex, let me tell you, that's not what you'll find. Not to say that's not what a significant proportion, if not most, yaoi is, I found this an atypical yaoi. So, if you read this and loved this, that doesn't mean the rest of yaoi will be your cup of tea. Nor does it mean that if you read this and wondered where all the naked sweaty guys were from chapter to chapter, that you won't like yaoi, even if this isn't your cup of tea.
Except for Paul and his two travelling companions, Luke and Aristarchus, all on board that ship were unbelievers and were anticipating the worst physical death and after that the judgment (Hebrews 9:27). All of the passengers were fighting for their lives and they feared death. But Paul knew the Lord and he believed Him.
I stayed overnight in my brother’s dorm room Friday night and we woke up early Saturday to pack up his stuff and help him move out of his dorm. We grabbed a quick breakfast at Westside Market (no, not the Cleveland landmark) before meeting up with my parents to pack up his stuff into their rented van. My brother had to work again, so my parents, B and I headed to the High Line to explore the green area on what was turning out to be a gorgeous, 70something degree day. The High Line was beautiful – for you non-NYers, the High Line is a park/walking route in on an old, abandoned above-ground and above the streets train tracks. The tracks are no longer in use, and instead of tearing them down, the city decided to turn the overgrown tracks into a park-like walking area, above the city. There are gorgeous plants, vendors selling food and cute artsy stuff, sprinklers for kids to run through, and more, all along the walkway.
Now I have met a few exceptions, but this rule is generally the same. It even extends to the students. I think I go to the most apathetic university in America. It’s not a very competitive school, so a lot of kids that didn’t have a lot going for them go here to get a degree and get their lives on track to a career.
and from my darling hubby I received
careless and refined.
It’s best to think of a cloud in this way. It’s a utility that delivers your computing as a service rather than a product. Instead of accessing a system direct from the hard drive of your PC, you are using a browser online to log into the same system or most likely a better one. The big difference is that at the end of the day, when you save your information, it’s saved to your cloud space and any of your colleagues can access it – from anywhere.
The image I used today is called Heart Blooming Tree and it's adorable and I thought it would be perfect for a Valentine's Day card!
There's an oppressive competence to the Eagles' first album of new material in - yes, folks - 28 years. The close harmonies still hold. The sweet melodies continue to flow. And the words uphold a vintage mix of sentimentality and indignation. No true Eagles fan will walk away from these 20 tracks feeling wholly ripped off or misled.
-Beijing Institute of Aeronautics
On top of this, Medion has packed the Erazer with a whopping 16GB of RAM. Most conventional £600 laptops still only come with 4GB, and the difference was clear as soon as we loaded up our benchmark tests. The Erazer screamed through the performance part of our testing easily and as soon as we loaded up some gaming, the Nvidia GeForce graphics card joined in.
And Kennedy admits that folks in the White House are checking out the donor records:
Have a sensational Saturday and a great, big, beautiful tomorrow.
Busy week around these here parts...so it's always fun to come and check out all the inspiring links...
From the start, we know that the author is taking a slightly different approach to terminal cancer. “This Support Group featured a rotating cast of characters in various states of tumor-driven unwellness. Why did the cast rotate? A side effect of dying.” I was surprised to find myself laughing out loud at several points. I was not surprised to also find my heart broken, inevitable given the subject matter.
And too heavy to pay to take to the landfill, let alone add another 'thing' in the deep caverns of our precious mother that could be useful...but how?
Basically you grate the soap pop it in a saucepan with the glycerin and heat it all till the soap dissolves then walk away and leave it for 12 hours. This Blog shows you how with pretty pictures - click here. I left mine for almost 24 hours and it turned out fine. We then popped it into some bottles and I even made some labels.
Well, only a few more days of these commercials and then a breather for a few months.
In aisles too narrow for your hips
He flipped Hart the bird. “Sit and spin.”
The one in the foreground was the cause of many boy-battles (lol), and the two in the background are my new acquisitions, a little worn and ready for a facelift.
And of course, plea bargaining works against this. People who plea bargain and are innocent pretty much piss their chances of future review away.
Unique salt plate that reminded me of how someone back in the days may have discovered this little mine and ended up grilling food over open flame...but for the first time on that slat plate. And you know what..that is exactly what we did. Grilled fish with raw vegetables over open flame. Time did stop and home smelled off grilled fish over salt plate that has not seen any technology. It was glorious...
The day before yesterday, I moved from my son Jason’s apartment to my daughter-in-law’s home where I have use of the bedroom during her and her husband’s one week jaunt to Paris and then on to Venice to experience Carnavale and frozen body parts. Attending Carnavale being one of those things I imagine Anne envisions as an early start on her bucket list.
My goal? To have this packet completed by day after tomorrow! I want it to grab a certain journalists attention and not just get them intrigued but get them excited to help others through a storyline! So, it is with that level of energy, I log of for tonight (or this morning, lol) and get back down to it! Live every day with passion!!
What is this Platinum Mix free ink? There are so many inks then whats so special about the Platinum brands mix free ink/
Spinal Tap is a British Heavy Metal Band that has built a long legacy as one of the most prolific music groups in Music History.
Not so long ago, a comment was made on the CAMRA web forum that the Good Beer Guide will “increasingly give you the local equivalent of the Kelham Island Tavern. It will not simply tell you where to find good real ale.” The Kelham Island Tavern being a two-time winner of CAMRA’s National Pub of the Year award and a classic example of the multi-handpump specialist beer pub.
There was a subtle flood of steam
He then gave me a detailed scheme to avoid this situation. He said that one should work out an "alley plan" before pulling into such a mess. One could zip down side streets, avoiding Dummy traffic.
The complaints about my “anti-Catholic” attitude on this thread are puzzling. My views re ecclesiology, which I have discussed on other posts, are quite conventionally Roman Catholic, as is my celebration of the liturgical year and my reading of the lectionary.
Anyway, Diane rises to respond to these screams and the laws of gravity suddenly change, flinging her against the wall. And like a vending machine gummy spider in reverse, her body starts rolling upwards and onto the ceiling. Successfully fighting this supernatural force, she drops to the ground and proceeds to run to her children. Again, she battles more of the Poltergeist’s chicanery as the hallway starts to elongate. She has to run as fast as she can to get to her children’s door. But the Poltergeist isn’t done tricking her.
Also known as the Gauss ‘hog. Only used in campaign matches and brutally powerful- one hit kill for enemies and only a handful for any vehicle.
And I lead you all in the dance, said he
For me this movie is the synonym of Christmas, since I can remember I’ve watched this film someday betwwen Decmber 14th and Christmas day to get me into the Christmas spirit.
Don't forget to hop over to the challenge blog and see what the rest of the DT have created.
And so, on that note, due to some family issues back home and southern roots that go deep...we are ending our Alaskan adventure this Sunday. The hubby will return this summer for construction season, which will be difficult for us being apart that long, but necessary as he is committed to the company he works for for this summer season and for income for us to settle back in down south. We continue to pray for guidance on this path. We have no doubt whatsoever that He led us here for a reason and we feel at peace with the fact that we are going back...I look forward to whatever adventures He has in store for us on the journey of life. We've learned much about ourselves here, we've learned what we can and can not live without, or with, for that matter. See you all from the Southeastern side!
The health ministry said more than 150 people were injured on Wednesday and that many were receiving treatment at a nearby field clinic.
Welcome to Script Frenzy 2012! Script Frenzy is an annual challenge held by the Office of Letters and Light in April to write a 100-page script in the month of April.
- Some people don't even know that red wine is only red because they put the skins back in later. I give talks, Dan says, and I really have to go back to basics.
This was the most exciting session yet, and I really got a kick out of it (and the players seemed to as well). Although faced with the possibility of a powerful enemy escaping from them, they mixed it up with a real challenge for a change and came out with flying colors. And Terry’s Jedi Lucia gets a colorful addition to her bio – namely, the soul of another Jedi whom now sort of haunts her (in a non-evil way), but also gives her a little bonus to a couple of stats and hit points when she is in contact with her. This will make for some interesting role-play down the line, methinks. I think Terry may have been struggling with what exactly the personality of Lucia was, but now she for sure has an interesting angle to work from. I originally though Amelia might do this bonding thing with the male Jedi (I thought he would get the focus of damage and be the first knocked out of the fight), and also thought it would be funny if her spirit bonded with the Wookiee, but in the end I am glad Terry will be the one dealing with it. Her character seemed the least fleshed out.
DOCTOR ICE HANDS: Haha! That’s funny, but I seriously have to check your prostate.
Her 2 "chores" are to put her clothes in the dirty clothes and to put her shoes in her shoe drawer when we get home. She LOVES doing these two things and is so proud of herself afterwards.
the room was already painted this bright, happy turquoisey color, so we decided to go with all-white for the painting (i thought the contrast would be really nice, plus, we are going to paint the "sweet dreams" letters in the future, too).
What's wrong with me? I've waited so long for this baby, how could I ever wish such a terrible thing? I don't deserve to be the mother to this child, a mother to my daughter, or a wife to my husband. I don't deserve them and they don't deserve this life with me. Guilt. Guilt. Guilt. The never-ending spiral of guilt. The worse thing is that it becomes a vicious cycle... the more guilt I would feel, the more depressed I would become, which would result in more guilt.
paid private schooling for his children, upscale automobile and an $55,000
The city of Charlotte is relatively large, but unlike many cities it's built more spread out than upward. The center city of Charlotte is about a 40 minute drive from my apartment and the commute tends to keep me in my neck of the woods. The past week however, I have been pet sitting for friends who are on their honeymoon. They live on the outskirts of uptown in a little area called Noda, or North Davidson. It been a bit of an adjustment not being at my house, or in a familiar area, but over the weekend Ben joined me in Noda for the perfect Charlotte Staycation.
“All you have to do is say, ‘I wish’ and let me take care of the rest.” Each passing second the bean seemed to gain mass while the electricity crawled through the thin layer of skin, wrinkles, sunspots, and life, surging through her veins like life begging to explode. Was it magic or dying? There was little time for choices and whether Jack with the Robert Redford eyes was a liar or not, there was only one way to find out. Mattie closed her eyes as she had seen Kathy and many a wish makers do on TV and in the movies than tugged at the handle on her memory closet; “I wish I could take back my mistake. I wish I hadn’t let Greta die. I wish I was with her now.” The wrinkled crease of her eyelids could not hold back the tears; she strained to hold them back defying her need to break into a crying fit on a public bus as her last act in life but hearing herself utter the burden of her past kept guarded in lonely silence for so long could not damn tiny rivers trickling down her face.
Lovingly stowed in a box labeled “hats” we have:
13. Allow the floor to air dry thoroughly. Do not force dry. This stage is completed when the floor is clean, dry and neutral pH7.
More good advice from the little bird…work with what you’ve got.
What makes you feel abnormal?
Under the pew.
The man laid his hand on his son’s dark head. “Let it go, Son. Sometimes we just have to let it go.”
The robots shine colorful lights out of their asses while they search for the escaping Princess. She keeps saying she’s looking for something but I don’t quite catch what. The dimense portal? The immense portal? Whatever. She finds it but before she can turn on the ditense porma, the robots and the evil Uncle Duke catch her.
What would you do if you won a million dollars or more?
“How are you doing, Zeph?” he asked.
Secretly, inexorably, they are infiltrating our world, sucking the essence out of unsuspecting victims with their hideous parody of a kiss.
Darkly Dreaming is a lot of work because it’s Eric’s POV, which is tough to write on its own without trying to do justice to Dexter’s complex character (I’m planning on a gender and writing post inspired by that difficulty, so keep that in mind for the second poll). I’d finish it, but only if there’s interest.
5) Compassion in the Everyday Do not fall into the trap of comparing yourself to others, especially those who have the spotlight; reach out to those around you, wherever you are, and you will start to see your impact.
- That's him. Well he put me in his band. Thought I was destined for the Big Time, so I did. Gonna put the harmonium on the musical map, you know, Danny?
Here's where the bribe comes in. If you register and vote for Leslie, (Leave me a comment telling me you did.) I'll send you a free ebook. (Blue Eyes and Other Teenage Hazards or Playing the Field--although if you live near me or will see me at a conference soon, I have a variety of paperbacks you can choose from too.) If you also vote for Leslie for the next four days (You can vote once ever 24 hours--and once you're registered, it only takes a few seconds each day.) I'll promise to send you my next ebook free too. (It will be a rewrite of either Masquerade or Dakota's Revenge, whichever I get to first.)
There's wins; Good Wins; Bad Wins; and Lucky Wins. And then there's losses; Some Good; But most losses are usually bad if you look at them as such. Some losses are down right awful. That makes tonight's game horrific. Walter Matthau could have jammed a six-pack down everyone of his kid's throats and the Bad New Bears would still have made us look like....Well, why not use the owner's colorful descriptive again. You know which one.
Random lady: Oh, and I love babies. Don't tell the feminists!
Also, it’s not too late to make the decision to join us! Did you even know there was such a thing as “Screen Free Week”? I didn’t until about 4 days ago. Take the challenge! Unplug!
“May the odds be ever in your favor!”
Ah; I'm having some troubles accessing the saved links, and my battery is dying, and its after 2a my time. So, I'm done posting.
Last time we checked, while working on last year’s profile of McKay, the former prosecutor turned legalization activist did not reciprocate the warm fuzzies. "He got what he deserved," McKay said of Emery. "He wanted to change policy, and the way he chose to do that was not to get himself elected to the B.C. parliament, but to break the law."
Interrogations are the backbone of L.A. Noire. They follow a simple formula: ask a question and decide whether to believe, doubt, or accuse the witness of lying. In the latter, evidence of deception must also be provided. Meanwhile, interrogations also present an opportunity for L.A. Noire to put to use its astonishing facial animation: three-dimensional captures of actors' performances are recreated in-game. Ultimately, shoe-horning all interrogations into the truth-doubt-lie formula leads to some rather contorted dialogue. They work well enough, but I often felt more inspired by their potential than impressed with their execution.
Good morning all.
On Saturday, March 24th we had a beautiful viewing and graveside service for sweet Emery. We were blessed with beautiful weather and those who spoke to us were blessed with the words that we all needed to hear. At the end of the graveside service we all released pink balloons in honor of little Emery and it was beautiful to watch them rise up to Heaven which is where the children are sure they were going, up to little Emery.
Their takes on life are often much more concrete than mine. They restate with confidence the things they hear at home or church or from other teachers and sometimes older schoolmates. I'm impressed with what they understand of modern technology and often amazed at what they think they understand about politics. A brash young fellow told me he would vote Republican in November if he could because the Democrats were taking soda out of schools and, as he liked to drink soda every day, he would be forced to drink "plain old water, yuk!" if President Obama were to be reelected. Another little tyke asked me if I thought her "ass was sexy. My mother said it is."
scrambling for the goods, the lines are drawn.
So I make no claims that somehow the position that Speaker Boehner and I discussed reflects 100 percent of what I want. But that’s the point. My point is, is that I’m willing to move in their direction in order to get something done. And that’s what compromise entails. We have a system of government in which everybody has got to give a little bit.
If you hurry you can take advantage of the 40.5% off sale that ends tonight
Four million big ones! It just goes to show the ludicrous gulf between a celebrity chef and someone who actually cooks for a living.
Perhaps it’s also about dissociating Bukit Gasing from the efforts of Save Bukit Gasing to highlight the fear of residents for their safety because of developments at Bukit Gasing. Is it also about our highlighting recent problems with earthworks at Bukit Gasing? See recent posts.
You speak, but never say a thing,
- oh and I will try to do a more detailed review of the F&B foundations between MAC and MUFE as soon as I can (I've barely used either foundation during the winter months)
My youngest brother Timothy is a wordsmith and the night she died he said it best...he had been flying through the night to reach me and my mother and while enroute was amazed as he looked down through his airplane window at how beautiful the Eastern seaboard is from 10,000 feet above. He had always thought my Mother's life tragic and sad and that in recent years, things had not gone well for her, but then he saw her from 10,000 feet and saw everything about her differently and with a panoramic perspective.
At this point the system often simply hangs up on you, so you call back a dozen times until you finally do get through to an actual live person (who, remember, you will have to ask to repeat everything he says at least 5-10 times to understand him). Alternatively, a live person may answer, who promptly gets drowned out by the previous recorded announcement...and the call is dropped. So you call a dozen more times until a heavily accented person comes on the line. This whole Abbott & Costello routine can go on a dozen times.
And He does so with Everlasting Love and Mercy.
influential as Wertham claimed. For every Wertham there was another professional who disagreed. In
These are my ideas for color schemes right now:
F1 Bake calipers must have no more than six pistons, two pads and two mounting points. The material is restricted by an 80Gpa stiffness requirement; aluminum lithium is most commonly used.
The test looks for how genes are altered by environmental factors like alcohol and hormones – a process known as epigenetics. One in five women is thought to have such a genetic “switch” that doubles breast cancer risk.
One student told deputies he was called into Alege's office this past school year to discuss the student's declining grades and was ordered to remove a shoe and sock, "and lift up a foot and Mr. Alege popped his toes by pulling them out and bending them down."
“Four soldiers were killed and two others were wounded in this cross-border attack,” a senior security official in Peshawar told AFP.
If there’s a chance that Occupy will be a sustained movement next year and beyond, these calls are a key area to watch. Says Donovan: “We’re going to be laying those wires between people all winter long. In the spring everyone is going to be motivated and ready to act. If the job situation stays as it is, all they’re going to have on their hands is time. There’s going to be nothing but room for protest and dissent and creativity. “
Anyway, I will add this article to my Sack of Stuff (Defining Articles) that are kept in the cellar, for readers who want to reference it in the future.
Her colors are pewter gray and dark apple red (cool, huh?) I wanted to use a few different pendant shapes, and took a spin to the next town to a bead shop to see what they had. Nada. But they did have some awesome moukaite roundels with lots of mauve and pink in them (which I had been casually looking for here and there), so I picked up a strand of those and ended up making this:
Today is another spectacular day, and I hope all of you enjoy it too!
News - Politics: Malema upsets MDC:ANC Youth League president Julius Malema has upset the Zimbabwean political party, the Movement for Democratic Change, by meeting only Robert Mugabe's Zanu-PF on a visit to Harare.
Died July 6, 1962 (aged 64)
It says more than anyone on this planet could ever imagine. (this may be why I'm a theist)
Alex and I steeled ourselves for the worst. We saw where the conversation was going and it was nowhere good.
Quite simply: I WOULD LOVE THIS!
This dress is made from lovely gold latex with black tiger stripes.
St. Augustine of Hippo bears testimony to the practice in the Western Church of infants receiving from the Lord’s Table:
“Heyla, shield-maiden,” he began in a voice as rich and smooth as rare Drenieval whiskey. The underlying lethal heat in his voice could rob the unwary of their senses. “I have not seen you here afore.” He held out a hand. “My name is Cianan.”
I would surely love to see you at a session soon!
So it's been eight years since I've finished a song. But I've started hundreds! I'll think of a catchy chorus or interesting rhyme, write it down on paper, chart the chords. And then as soon as I hear it come out of my mouth, I deem it pure rubbish. Nonsense. Mediocre. Lame.
How do you come up with the just right ending for a conflict of that scale? The sheer number of harvested, the destruction, the overwhelming odds; Those problems don’t get solved easily. So yeah, I’m still digesting the ending. I didn’t hate it, but even knowing there was grief and controversy, it wasn’t what I expected. That isn’t necessarily a bad thing. It also wasn’t what (I think) I wanted, but I’m not sure how I could have been given what I wanted realistically or with integrity to the epic journey. So yeah, it is what it is…
But this morning I found my Grandmother's recipe for Whippersnappers. And my outlook has changed.
I accept that leopards and cheetahs are different species of big cat, and there is quite a a difference between Siberian tiger and a Sumatran one, but then again, unlike mules, which, as one pro mixing blogger by the name of Liliput kindly reminded me, can not breed, ligers and tigons can do so, albeit, as yet, without great success, so the scenario might not be so absurd.
Stick to whole and natural grains that are high in fiber and have gone through minimal processing. Keep refined sugars and alcohol to a minimum.
Day 16,057 of the Journey...
Give to the Lord, you families of nations,
For the last 10 or so years
Be sure to check out these parties...linking to....
I pray that the Peace of God will be with you, this New Year 2011. I pray for you too prosper, and the New Year will be a awesome one for you. I want to thank everyone, who has followed me and left sweet and wonderful comments. I feel blessed from you all, meeting new people and all of us sharing our creative artwork, with each other. What a blessing to all of us! God is good all the time! I thank God, for Blessing me to see another New Year and seeing what this year will bring to all of us. I haven't done much crafting during the Holiday Season. But now I will have time too! Have a Blessed and safe New Year's weekend.
The Point Provers :
We looked into adoption - but that is very very expensive. There was a foster to adopt program through CPS, but we don't qualify. Instead of being the parents we have always dreamed of, we will be the two old people on the front porch, drinking coffee, surrounded by our Chihuahuas.
This week I want to see you create a card/project using PAPER FLOWERS! These can be paper flowers that you have purchased from the craft store, or flowers that you have punched and created yourself....you choose! Just be sure to include some sort of paper flower on your creation. If you have no clue what I'm talking about, I have a tutorial HERE on my blog that might help you get started.
Robert Spencer is the director of Jihad Watch and author of the New York Times bestsellers The Politically Incorrect Guide to Islam (and the Crusades) and The Truth About Muhammad. His latest book, Did Muhammad Exist?, is now available.
Form the dough into a long (12” or 13”) log about 2 inches in diameter. Because the dough is so thick, I find it easiest to do this by pinching off hunks of dough from the bowl and lining them up on a large sheet of plastic wrap to form a log, then massaging and pressing them together to seal. Wrap well and refrigerate at least two hours, or overnight.
“I’m at a payphone. I managed to escape just a few minutes ago. But there are people who are still after me.”
Rosettes were created with the Mini Paper Rosettes die and added to the outside of the crown. The inside was lined with crepe paper to give the crown a 'full' look. Next, flowers were cut from polyester lining fabric using the Tattered Florals die. Heating them lightly with a heat tool causes them to shrink and ruffle - I love using this technique! They were then layered, attached to a wire and adhered to the inside of the crown.
Gemma seems to be fitting in very well. There has not really been any big issues. She and Ava have their moments but it is nothing major. She is very trusting of us. She is doing better in the car and no longer getting sick but Gemma is very much a home body. When we are out and about she always wants to know when we will be home. Her English is slowly coming along but it is still very hard to communicate without a translator. I think school will help in that department. She goes to bed easily and sleeps well every night. Ava is doing much better in the sleeping department too, thank you God!
The sound of STORM CORROSION can best be described as enchanting, orchestral, ambient, epic (half the album’s tracks clock in around the 10 minute mark) and nothing short of surprising to the new ear. However, the musicians’ respective fanbases will be primed to appreciate the new output, with Wilson’s recent solo album, ‘Grace For Drowning’ and Opeth’s ‘Heritage’ having brought them to a logical place to understand STORM CORROSION.
every
I met him when all of us friendly friends were at the bar, one night around New Year’s Eve. Louie and I flirted…and Louie and I got drunk. We had tons in common – we were both artists, being the main point - and he seemed like a fun person. Plus, there was instant trust on account of the mutual friends. Then we madeout, at the bar, because we were drunk and classy.
Following the suicide of their mother, Atreus and his brother lived the land in exile. It was there that Atreus met his wife Aerope and he vowed to sacrifice his best lamb to Artemis, but when he found a golden lamb from his flock did he pick it out to be sacrificed? Of course, lamb be pimp and golden yo, so he had his wife hide it to prevent it from sacrificing it. What Atreus did not know was Aerope gave it to her lover, Thyestes! That's right Aerope was sleeping with Atreus' brother behind his back, but Thyestes had bigger plans to do with that lamb (I know what you are thinking, but there is surprisingly little bestiality in this story) Thyestes then told his brother that there should be something that would decide who would be king. He then convinced Atreus that whoever had a golden lamb would be king of this domain. Just as Atreus was going to say that he had the lamb, WA-BAM! Thyestes pulls that piece of living woolly bling out and is crowned king.
McCloy
Caren
Anyhow, what can I say? The show was really bad. It felt like all the losers from"American Idol" and "So You Think You Can Dance" came together and started their own show called A Tribute To Dirty Dancing. It was amateur, badly choreographed, and way WAY too long. There was no soul, no humor and no chemistry. Everyone wanted to be a rock star, but none of them were good enough or charismatic enough to be rock stars.
No ties my travels clog;
The little alien plush would be eternally grateful if we took steps to make this planet greener.
and all that
Who can resist a little blow-torched meringue? I can barely contain my excitement as my spoon dips past the meringue and meets layers of salted peanut butter parfait sandwiched around a centre of banana caramel.
EMO: *sets up laptop*
Butterflies were in short supply that day, but did turn up a Viereck’s Skipper for the first time this year.
Moving in Saturday morning with the help of Pam and Pat (a kid from my old internship) was fun despite a few nicks and bruises. In three hours we had all of my furniture and possessions moved from one apartment to the other. By the end of the night I had unpack and decorated the living room, with the exception of a few things waiting to be hung on the walls, and my bedroom was nearly unpacked. Sunday afternoon I finished my room by the time I left for church at 4:30pm.
After showering I change into my clothes. I hate wearing yesterdays clothes. I consider the advantages of wearing yesterdays knickers over going commando and then remember the time I accidently flashed my thong. Yesterdays knickers it is.
And comb your hair.
Anyway.. it is late.. and I need to take a pill for pain so I can sleep.. and don’t want to get any sloppier than I already am in my writing.
And to the person who keeps sending me the YouTube videos of hatred and misinformation...do you really expect me to post them? To even waste my time viewing them? Really, some people can be so silly at times.
those record players that all other girls but me seemed to have, just that square box
It’s fine to say take a bath, get a massage, work in the garden, get your nails done, call a friend, read a book. These may help, and are certainly valid suggestions, but they generally aren’t as quick, cheap, available and effective as food and drink. Yes, we self-medicate with food, and booze, but sometimes one needs that medication to get through the day – or night – right? At least, it sure feels that way sometimes.
She blushed. “You just… grew up.” The last time she had seen him like this, he had been a 17-year-old teenager. Beautiful to her 16 year old eyes, to be sure, but that boy had been replaced by a man with broad shoulders and defined... everything. She traced a scar below his collarbone. “Where did you get this?”
Early 1978 Rehearsal (Take 1)
Fast forward to the beginning of this book where EVERYONE pities Michelle.
Or maybe – in these days when we’re re-considering dozens of other societal institutions — it’s time to revisit the value of gravity. Has this fundamental interaction of nature lost its appeal? Do we still want to live in a universe in which objects with mass attract one another? Or is it time to shop around for other systems of physics?
DID YOU KNOW YOU COULD WIN OUR ENTIRE JANUARY RELEASE? Have you checked out our New Year Challenge? Just click HERE to find out how to play! You can also play in our Noon Time Challenges! Check out yesterday’s noon time challenge – The Year of the Dragon Challenge. Or, you could check back today at noon for another special, fast-paced challenge designed to spark creativity and give you another chance to win some wonderful goodies! All challenges will close this Friday at 5 PM ESTand winners will be announced Saturday in our Winner’s Circle blog post! So get those fingers inky and good luck!
We couldn't get in the house fast enough and she was clawing at the package like a deranged squirrel. After a few minutes she reluctantly agreed to let me be of some assistance.
“Well,” he told me, “I went to borderline things where I thought, I can still live with saying this and feel morally OK with it and not hate myself. But there was some stuff I could never have done with a clean conscience. It was not that terrible, but I would not like doing it for a long period.”
and I am an Artist.
This is the legal logic behind Tariq Ramadan’s position on hudud. His stance is fully consistent with the most rigorous interpretations of Islamic law, which is why Muslim religious authorities do not condemn it. In fact, headstrong zealots like Anjem Choudary are sometimes enjoined by their more educated fellows not to push so hard for shari’ah in the West, because it is “too early”.
Go see them if you can. They transcend greatness.
Director: Lars von Trier
Here are some pictures from our outing to the Tidal Basin and the FDR Memorial.
John Akomfrah’s investigation into the mentality of immigration uses Homer’s The Odyssey as a structuring device and sits somewhere between documentary, film essay and cine-poem. It’s daring, original and shot through with incredible intellectual rigour. Destined for the subject of post-film, caffeine-fuelled debate.
The sky screamed foreboding. The weather girl told otherwise, uncomfortably holding this vacuous grin. It comes from trying to pass off information you received only a split-second ago as expertise. I can't believe you actually liked it, I mean anybody can wave their hands around and read autocue.
I got the cane most Mondays at my new school in Stockwell. The first two or three Mondays I got it for being late after assembly, two stripes on each hand with a cane. After that I got it for insolence. That's what they called it when you can't say why you were late, (or won't.)
As ‘power’ will be our concern, we will begin by talking about power in the classroom setting, finding agreement on terminology we can use for Elements of Power—drawn from our own experience. In our first class we will work out and agree on a code of mutual respect, create a contract to define relationship and responsibilities between student/participants and those taking on the role of class leader.
One of the reasons why we love FLEX so much is because of the emphasis on core strength. Many of our first time guests have never worked their core, and have never learned the importance of having a strong core. The core is your power house, and allows your body to withstand demanding physical challenges, in the gym — and out.
“We have shown that we have the technologies as well as the knowledge to become sustainable and safeguard our blue planet,” Domjan said in a statement.
Each stock uses only pork bones and water. "No salt, no sugar, no MSG" he tells empthatically. "Only pork bone. And water". The only salt comes from soy sauce which is added after the soup has been ladled into a customer's bowl.
When I say Who’s My NEIGHBOR, I want you to say I’m Your NEIGHBOR
My sister and her S.O. came down to spend the weekend visiting my dad and us. She lives almost 4 hours away, so we don’t get together all too often, so we usually have a great time when we get together. They stopped here to pick us up to go with them to St. Louis to pick up some candles that my sister will be selling in her new little retail space. The shop where she picked up the candles had a retail space, so we spent a little time browsing. By the time we left the shop, we declared that it was time for lunch, so we headed to a cute little place … a general store with a deli in back where we had some of the best sandwiches we’ve ever had! I wish I had thought to take my camera with me so I could share some pictures of the fun we had. By the time we finished up with lunch, it was time to head out to our dad’s to watch the Cardinals game … which they won.
Something deliciously desserty was in order. Blondies! Blondies (some people know them as Congo Bars) are bar cookies with endless possibilities for invention, just like Bela Fleck’s music. They can simply be a chocolate chip cookie in bar form. Or you can experiment with all sorts of variations in addition to or in place of chocolate chips: nuts, coconut, dried cranberries, dried cherries, white chocolate chips.
10. The attractiveness of modesty.
Also, I don’t think this is a teen idea: it’s classic adventure story territory, no more complicated than the setup in the Harry Potter or Dark Materials books. And quite frankly I didn’t want Charlie and Tobias snogging! There aren’t enough adventure books for 9+ with strong female leads. Girls are often ghettoised into pink and sparkly. Publishers are worried boys won’t read about female characters. Well, they do if you give them the right one. Pullman proved that with Lyra, and boys seem to be loving this book as much as the girls.
“Some cynics are arguing that the Government has cleverly buried this under the wreckage from the student protests”, said a lobby correspondent of my acquaintance yesterday. I think that’s ascribing far too much sensitivity to the Cameroons. What they need to do – and fast – is wake up to the near-crippling damage this could do them. Tonight as I write, it is hard to find an old hand anywhere in Medialand or politics who believes Andy Coulson’s protestations of ignorance. Advisors around the Prime Minister need to give him a reality check.
"Eric," he said, "I want you to meet Mr. Black, Mr. McScribe, and Chief Rain-in-the-Face. Gentlemen, my friend and sometimes colleague, Mr. Dale."
Now it was time to go for a wander in the virtually deserted grounds. I had never been in the grounds, before.
These 2 great hosts have teamed up with 12 other bloggers to bring you an amazing event full of great prizes!! This giveaway hop will run from 12:01 AM on 01/25/2012 until 11:59 PM on 02/05/2012.
~ St. Cyril
"I am not going to grant or dismiss the summons," said district judge Bruce Morgan, sitting at Redditch Magistrates' Court.
1. King Henry The Fifth / Elegy For The Brave
Well that's enough belly aching from me on the matter, it is what it is.
Dear Ma:
Although Jesus used this figure of speech,
goes the rain
Also on the site are a fetching pair of suede patch leggings. They are £40 but after realising that my old trusty pair of ribbed American Apparel leggings and a cashmere camel jumper is my post-lecture go-to 'vege-out-fit' and that in terms of cost per wear I'm probably now being paid to wear said leggings, the idea of spending that £40 on another pair isn't too painful an idea.
Y'all.
1 T ground ancho chilie
An overview of television’s function as America’s favorite pastime with specific emphasis on the idea of television as a location which becomes important in a way that matters to viewers in their real lives.
July 18 - Edson Stroll, actor (Virgil Edwards on "McHale's Navy"), 82
Today's post is all about clearing the decks, a sort of work basket tidy up. There are a few items that have been in the work basket for quite a while now, gloves and socks and a beret, gloves, not to mention the fish blanket. The beret and fish blanket seemed to be permanent residents of the work basket, and perhaps I need to mention that when I say work-basket, both of those projects no longer seem to be in possession of a work-permit. The easiest projects to deal with are always the most recently cast on, the enthusiasm for those is higher, especially if they are simple projects with few modifications and so are straightforward to work.
Hence the title of the book. And the need to wash the fingers in the large mug of tea. The voice too is a form of entertainment, as Beckett puts it in Company:
VISUALS: Apparently Thorton insisted that no red be shown in the movie, as he hates red in movies (unless they are about the Revolutionary War). We did not notice this.
Tue-AM: :39, 500' ~ Amphitheater
So for my spinach I first go to Epicuriou. Here are the first 5 recipes when I search for just the word spinach:
He's coming over on Sunday again and we're most likely meeting up Tuesday (maybe in Dublin even we shall see..) and then he's coming over next Friday week for the Open Mic night session that's going to be on here - he wants to be by my side all night and did offer to break the legs of my not so nice stalker... hmm tempting. lol. And then the following Saturday morning he's taking me away to this little cottage in Connemara for a couple of nights.. No phones.. no TV.. just open fires and walks along the beach.
Some try to disguise their true purpose by flourishing lottery tickets or mobile phone 'Airtime' vouchers – though others shamelessly count, indeed flaunt, their wads of cash.
What follows is a brief review (sorta a review) of Kierkegard’s Concluding Unscientific Postscript. The review, at the very least, underscores why I’ve asserted elsewhere that Kierkegaard’s Point of View for my Work as an Author is so vital to understanding his work overall.
I saw these footed egg cups at the market...they called to me....loudly.
It's true, adults do have meltdowns too. I'm not talking about temper flare ups and the urge to hit people who don't agree. You don't need to be on the spectrum to have those - though having a little alcohol and/or stress sometimes helps.
I’m standing there
in heavy, exhausted whispers.
I got the impression yesterday that she wanted to chat… We were working on benches that were side by side. Headphones in, music on, head down, don’t make eye contact… Those are my rules! I may have come across as standoffish, but I’m there to work out. Period!
on the toilet in the night, you are somewhere in the room,
Something is amiss with our value-system the way fat dowries are wheedled out even in the case of talented girls who can be an asset to anyone anywhere. I know of a senior official who did not stint on the education of his two daughters and gave them the very best that money could buy. While one of them was admitted in a reputed medical college and subsequently turned out to be a good doctor, the other one excelled in humanities and proved her mettle in no uncertain terms. But all their accomplishments were of no avail when it came to settling their marriage. Preposterous demands were made and it was only after hefty amounts had changed hands that the marriages could be solemnised.
I've been particularly fascinated by non-fiction book apps. The best of these integrate well written nonfiction text, vibrant full-color photographs and videos, interactive features that help students experiment and engage with the topics, and narration that makes the content accessible for a wide range of children. Here are some of my favorites that I shared today:
-Overly sensitive people who can’t take constructive criticism.
and then take a lot of photos of it.
Early Elementary Science - Human Body Unit with Literacy Math by Lisa of The Lesson Guide: "This Early Elementary Science based Anatomy Unit will teach students about the Human Body (inside and out) with colorful graphics and diagrams using a variety of Literacy and Math skills. This unit includes Measurement Skills, an original Poem with a Get Moving Analysis, Information/Facts about each Body Part with Vocabulary, Templates for students to create a nonfiction book about their body, Full color pictures of body parts and locations of body parts, a Classification and Math graphing activity with Critical Thinking Analysis, a Unit Project/Human Diagram, a Word Wall Classification activity with Phrase Cards, Resources and more!" (K-2)
Margaret Fleming, the JLL director of investment at JLL says that the Q1, 2011 figures do not include the effect of the proposed abolition of Upward Only Rent Reviews (UORRs) which, she claims, would lead to a “20 to 30 per cent” further decline in capital values. This is the first time I have seen an estimate over 20% to reflect the proposed changes to UORRs. The then-Society of Chartered Surveyors inIreland indicated that the estimated decline would be 20% for its portfolio that it assesses with IPD to produce its commercial prices index which rivals JLL’s.
However there is no such thing as a 100% solution in the world of security. And like any other ongoing fight adapting to the situation is the key to finding, and then exploiting your enemies weaknesses. And that is precisely what is being done to us. Because to some we are the enemy they are fighting.
Sight: kids playing outside, sprinklers on, people wearing tank tops/shorts/flip-flops, crowded pools and beaches, people fanning themselves, panting dogs, heat waves rising off the concrete, sunny days with intermittent showers and thunderstorms, lush green plants, fireflies blinking, bats dipping and flitting at dusk, tall grass, lawns being cut, fire hydrants gushing, bonfires and sleep-away camp
Cast: Ryo Ishibashi, Eihi Shiina,
At the peak of too many stairs for my little legs to mount.
Sunday morning spring snow:
*Also? It seems that in the great state of Texas, you can just randomly cut off other people's electric service. If you put in an order with another company at any address you please, that order will go to the other person's company and they will shut off the electric at that address. If, for example, your management company puts in a cut-off notice for your address after you have put in a "switch" order for your service, the electric company will cut-off the service and will NOT cut on the service in your name--and they will not tell you that your order has been cancelled. It will take the electric servicing company a minimum of 3 more days to get out there and turn it on. This information is important if and only if you plan on having electric in your new home, though. Just thought you might like to know that.
Paul waits until Natalie is alone, then tells her that he knows that she and Michelle were friends in high school. Natalie tells him that she thinks a killer is on the loose, and he replies that they should sit down somewhere else and talk about what's happening on the campus. They head to the newspaper office, where Natalie shares her theory that someone is using urban legends to murder people. Paul is skeptical, and asks her to give him a reasonable explanation as to why the killer is striking now. Natalie thinks it might have something to do with the massacre at Stanley Hall, since a party is being held on the 25th anniversary of the supposed incident.
Will she make new friends? Make good memories?
Can you imagine life without it?! I can! I've been there!
½ cup pineapple
The four of us worked for each other and had a ball.
I've read it to him before, but he didn't really remember it.
This man is a lot like me. He has worked with kids for a long time. Then decided it was time to get a job that wasn’t so stressful. He is athletic, although not necessarily as attractive as other guys I have dated. However, I really don’t care about that, because I am just so attracted to his personality, that I don’t care. He is very understanding, very easy to talk to. So I am confused by the distance.
the frozen charlotte and the pencil are from Retro Cafe Art Gallery. Ice Resin was then poured on top.
Since I believe talking about newspapers deserves more space that I can give in this blog devoted to my experiences in Peru, I have decided to set up another blog space entitled Periodically, Peru. Here is the link that will take you to my first entry about what I found in the August 1, 2011, edition of El Comercio.
I backed up another officer responding to an incessantly barking dog. When I arrived, a neighbor with keys to the dog owner's house came over and put the dog inside. This neighbor, however, had locked herself out of her own house and was trying for the past few hours to get in. She had two little boys with her about 5 and 3 years old. The 5 year old was still wearing his Superman pajamas and stared at me with wide admiring eyes while I worked on prying open a screen from a backyard window.
By this time, I'd already been on the monitors for an hour.
Remove the flavor packets from the soup mix
(Opening Day Festivities 1914)
I always think of HomeGoods for the little finishing touches—accessories, mirrors, bedding, pillows maybe. But check out the incredible rug my clients snatched up. They are so smart. This was the color scheme we were looking at, and the traditional style I was going for. I'd picked out samples of new rugs for them, but none were this perfect. And none, to be honest, were this well-made. A new high-end rug was just not in the budget.
Check out my spanish tortialla with ham, potatoes, onions. Special shout out to my friend Xen for the “reciepe”!
Reading a Text File Script Screenshot :
Ewww THAT is what we are eating for dinner?
Morley North
1 favorite
smile
Race Record: Starts: 30; Wins: 7; 2nd: 5; 3rd: 8; Win & Place Prize Money: £140,178
I’m SO excited to share that The Borrowed Abode has continued to support IHeart Organizing as my sponsor this month! Yep, still dancing around like a happy crazy person! A grateful happy crazy person!
Here is 1 computer model for Friday night 8pm. You notice precipitation moving into the region from the west. This is in response to a low pressure system currently bringing severe weather and heavy rain to the central and southern Plains. This low is currently “cut off” from the flow of the upper levels of the atmosphere, so it won’t move much the middle of this week. However, once it gets going again, it will work into our region and leave us with a rather crummy weekend as it appears now. Also with the cloud cover and dip in the jet stream, cooler air will filter into the area. Don’t worry, our temperatures will still be 10 to 15 degrees above average.
Video playback file formats: MPEG4-SP playback 30fps VGA, MPEG4-AVC playback 30fps QVGA, WMV9 playback 30fps QVGA, MPEG4-SP playback 30 fps nHD
I have contacted the college to see if they'll let me back in.
The other stamp in this series I picked up is of an Indian (so cowboys and Indians, Oh I have gone back in time now....I was always an Indian when playing that game, what were you?)
As the media tried to cover the story, Riot Grrrls recoiled from the coverage they received in periodicals like Newsweek, Spin, and the Washington Post. In response, the DC and Olympia chapter issued a directive that basically banned interaction with the media. As the aforementioned Nomy told Marcus, in retrospect the move proved a bit of a head scratcher. “I think it’s interesting that we .. made this decision and then wanted everyone else to abide by it, when supposedly Riot Grrrl was a decentralized movement,” Nomy reflected. “There was no reason to expect everyone else to go along with the blackout, without having some investment in the decision making process.” (228) Efforts to force a media blackout met with failure. The D.C. and Olympia sets may have been resolute in their boycott, but the other chapters popping up in places like Minneapolis consisted of women who viewed the media less warily. Jessica Hopper, a member of the Minneapolis outfit, disagreed with the order. “In her mind, any press attention for Riot Grrrl, however imperfect could help empower and inspire the girls who read the coverage,” conceded Marcus. (210) The subsequent Newsweek article horrified members throughout the movement. In general, journalists employed “easy stereotypes about appearance or sexuality, or else leaned on mainstream youth culture signifiers like MTV, things whose importance may have been axiomatic to readers but had little to do with what mattered to the girls,” summarized Marcus. Considering the level of community and confidence many of the Riot Grrrls had invested in each other, Hopper’s action left many shaken: “If riot grrrls couldn’t trust one another not to sell them out, who could they trust?” (214)
About three years ago I tried my hand a historical fiction. I couldn't get past the first three pages. It was then I, by accident, read a romance novel. Needless to say, I found what I wanted to write. Romance. For the last two years I've done nothing but. Paranormal and straight romance.
Keep doing what you're doing and if you feel you need a change, make it!!
One thing that does not carry over well in an English translation (and I’m quite sure we had a difficult time keeping it as well) is that Sasaki acts differently than what a girl is supposed to in Japanese society. Her use of the first person pronoun “boku” (and not in a cutesy way) challenges her status as a woman in that culture. We don’t see her chatter about the normal “girlish” things, nor do we see her speak much with her own gender. The only scene where she’s only with girls is when Kyon meets her at the station for the second time, and that’s with Kuyou and Kyouko Tachibana, two members of the Fake SOS-Brigade. I hope we get to see how she interacts at the class reunion.
The present-opening session on Christmas morning was a success: both Dougie and I vocalised our surprise at his generous gift.
Angie looked at Mara who immediately drew the attention of the nice looking gentleman. “Um, Mara, this is Bryan. He just stepped in from work, needing a drink. Bryan, my friend and coworker, Mara.” Angie waived her hand.
You'd admit to that?? To a woman who has just fixed your washing machine by doing what she suggested you try in the first place??
I love that you get to kill the dunmer you meet at the beginning of the game. I love that you lock yourself in in a manor with five people and systematically kill them off one by one, making them become extremely paranoid against each other.
It's been another great month here at penny Black and More and now it's time for some winners all selected by Mr Random Org.,................it would be sooooooo difficult if I had to choose the winners as there were so many fabulous entries........................but the DT do selected the entries who feature in our monthly 'In the Spotlight' feature, so keep an eye out in January to see who made it this month.
And this ring, that I would have given thee
How did you record this album?
EARLES INC. - DOES YOUR MOTHER KNOW?
Here we stand at the feet of the great Oak tree, so grateful for the gifts of big green acorns that this old tree is sharing with us
Here is the cover of my new book, Sexy Birth!
She remembered the way his arm had glowed.
So last week was a whirlwind!! I was in Mexico City, Mexico for work Monday through Thursday. Then Friday afternoon, after only about 15 hours home, I picked up my friend Lorraine and headed north to Interlaken Inn in Lakeville, Ct for our bi-annual Country Quilter quilting retreat. Along with 55 other quilters we had a wonderful 3 days of eating, laughing and quilting, thanks to the ladies of the former Country Quilter in Somers, NY. Even though the shop is closed, Claire Oehler, Nancy Mirman and Noreen Lipolis (CNN to their friends) have kept the retreat going. Claire was the owner of the Country Quilter for over 20 years, so she knows what it takes to make quilters feel at home.
Sonya: ” or any proof of linus being his successor?
If you haven't found that exercise, keep looking...it's out there for ALL OF US!!!
09. Norah Knows
Oh well, no-one can say lifes dull.
One of the beers readily available was Sheaf Stout, a beer originally brewed by Tooth and Company (original name: "Tooth's Sheaf Stout"--even more peculiar). In those early days, I was a huge fan of Terminator Stout, which seemed as close to being the opposite of Hamm's I could find. My life-long love affair with stouts was in the infatuation stage, but I might have forsaken the style were it not for Sheaf. I recall it as being a hell of a beer. Even burlier than Terminator, not a bit sweet--casual drinkers thought it punishing and beyond the pale. I was also a big fan of industrial music, and one wouldn't have been out of line in accusing me of just trying to be cool.
We also have the slight issue of the economy to consider as the food industry makes up a very large percentage of the workforce. If we were to suddenly require only one meal per day then the people who work in the food industry would surely lose their livelihoods. Again, there is a solution – rather than focusing on the sales of food, restaurants and cafes could set up rooms with special hydroponic lights that the customer could pay to sit in for 15 minutes to absorb different types of light (such as UV or fluorescent lights). The genetic coding of our new mossy skin will be linked in with our sense of taste and smell, so these different wavelengths of light could boast some exotic flavours for the customer during photosynthesis.
If you're reading this, you're probably a writer, and these issues matter to you. Which means you need to gather as much information as you can, and think long and hard about your goals and how to reach them.
In the same passage in which St. Paul mentions the apostasy (II Thessa-lonians 2:7), he gives a second name for this movement. He calls it the “mystery of iniquity,” or the “mystery of lawlessness.” He says: “The mystery of lawlessness is already at work,” preparing for Antichrist, who is the “man of lawlessness.” If we look around at our 20th century civilization, the word “lawlessness” or “anarchy” is perhaps the chief characteristic that identifies it.
When my turn came to say something, I talked a bit about unschooling and the ARGH gathering. It was not exactly the conversation spark I'd hope it would be.
Everybody made it home safe, with only a couple visits from law enforcement (not me).
What is it that makes the Christian life, ‘the road to life,’ a ‘narrow road’; and the ‘road to destruction’ a ‘wide road’?
The buttons on the shoes are colored in with silver metallic pen as are the toes of the shoes...You can't see it well in this picture but the saying has a silver metallic scalloped oval behind it..I used the deconstructed sketch for this card which I really liked...Be sure to stop by Sassy Studio Designs to check out this awesome challenge..
First there are two kinds of v sounds in english – the v and the w.
Brand new twelve months await and as we enter January and our reality is once again a pristine canvas, so much has the possibility to unfold.
(please note, this script will only work with Adobe Photoshop CS5 and the new CS6)
Greetings and Salutations on this the third day of January!
Design Papers: Basic Grey Sweet Threads 6x6 pad
So we just went to the city centre and I finally got my beloved cardigan from H&M, because I still a had a gift voucher left from my birthday.
Our first radio show is now available to download, and for continuity we are carrying on with the original show numbering. So Show 17 is yet another run out for Cover Versions! As this was the theme of our very first podcast, we though it appropriate to return to that for the inaugural radio show.
Fuck me. Really? This is happening right now? Who the hell did I piss off today?
But there is a problem. The weekly audience of 4-14 year olds on BBC Radio 7 is only 25,000--a small minority in the grand audio scheme of things. Children's radio programming will continue there--in the CBeebies 5-7am slot, which could be seen as a boon for early risers or, more negatively a graveyard, and books will continue to be featured on Big Toe. Radio 4 will feature Joan Aiken's Black Hearts in Battersea, Roald Dahl's Matilda, Erich Kästner's Emil and the Detectives and The Wizard of Oz at Christmas. But is it enough? Are the BBC thinking about what children really want, and more importantly how to provide it in a form they want?
Who wish for one more last goodbye?
Tower Tabulator. Serial 5CT 440003T. Made for Sears, Roebuck & Co. by Smith-Corona. If the serial for this machine is also in line with Smith-Corona's production of its own machines, then it dates to 1959. Note the radically different look given this machine through use of a smooth finished paint, and the large chromed logo. What is interesting is that this machine has a serial that runs in the Clipper serial number range, and like the Clippers this machine has the 42-key keyboard and no paper support arms.. but it DOES have a tabulator, albeit a manually-set one. It is interesting to see, in addition, that the serial numbers for the Silent stop in 1957. It would appear that the construction features were blurred between the former Silent and Clipper, and the Silent serial number range ended. This is educated speculating, and more investigation is needed on this sequencing. However, we're on it and the results will continue to appear here.
Singing low,
If you're planning on starting a blog to make some money, give it a shot. It doesn't hurt anything to try, right? Just keep in mind that I'm only making money from advertising because I get tens of thousands of hits a day.
The Rockin' Vickers version is not bad, it's far closer to The Kinks version (which appeared on the "Face To Face" LP) than any of the other versions and though it starts out with an acoustic guitar it's got a bit more cranked up electric guitar than The Kinks and played slightly faster, sort of "out Kink's-ing the Kinks" if you will. The real gem is the flip side, "I Don't Need Your Kind". From it's distorted guitar, sneering vocals and ragged beat and it's a brutal garage punk type record (with a simplistic solo from Lemmy worthy of anything on "Back From The Grave"). Nicky Hopkins (presumably) adds ivory tinkling which gives it the feel of any top shelf Who track circa '65.
Perfect! That’s it!
a) 67%
Here was my take on the "Almond Joy"
because she is SAD. do you get that shes SAD?
Some may say it's because I haven't had the right amber ales. I usually ask them "Which ones should I have? - then I answer that I've tried most of them and haven't been impressed.
Friday, March 12, 2010 8:00 PM
Oddly enough, I am LOVING spinning, but I am afraid of riding on the real road... I've heard too many stories and don't want to get hit or be run over... so, I only got in (2) 16-mile road rides before the 48 miles and was thinking it would take me around 5 hours to finish. I had a FANTASTIC ride and finished in 3:10... almost 2 HOURS FASTER THAN EXPECTED! I finished soooo early that I had time to go back to The Lot, get a shower and change before heading back to the finish line for the boys. 15.1 miles per hour average for me! WOOO HOOOO!
The 15-year-old was hit in the face by one of the group before a number of them punched and kicked him to the ground and stole his ipod.
I have traveled to foreign countries, gained language skills, studied a wide range of material, held a job, created opportunities for myself, and pursued knowledge for the sake of knowledge. All these things and more were my high school curriculum, they helped shape who I am, what I believe, and demonstrate my abilities and intelligence. I may not have a 4.0 average on a ready-made high school transcript, but I also haven’t been practicing for the real world, I’ve been living it.
Meanwhile I am learning how much my life has been centered around that machine. All my information is on an external hard drive but I can’t easily access it. I have the ancestry app on my iPad but the app does not give me a link to all my Family Tree Maker 2012 details. I cannot read my ‘Notes’ for individuals. I keep lots of details & sources there.
chocolate coating: 1/4 cup cocoa, 1/2 cup butter or coconut oil, 1/2 tsp. vanilla, 2 T. honey
That was a conversation stopper, and we fell into silence a bit. Who knows, though? Maybe this is what I sound like when I’m letting something else write through me! I always figured it would sound more like, “Blessings to all my children who come seeking union with their beloved.” Maybe I am a channel for Shecky Greene rather than St. Germaine. (Given a choice, I would have opted for Kerouac.)
see you on November 14 and 15 at the Global Pinoy Bazaar. Suportahan natin ang likhang Pilipino. :)
I thought I would write down the quick and dirty version of what I did since (A) I didn't take pictures and (B) I want to be able to remember how I did it.
the nice thing about going on these trips is the party's and the schmoozing...
Summer League roster 2010
Edna is my grandmother, and Zach told her one day in particular he loved her. Zach would be have been two years old when this letter was written.
I watched this video, and it brought tears to my eyes. Because tonight, our community came together to celebrate the achievement of young people...young people of all different colors, nationalities, socioeconomic backgrounds, and religious beliefs. However, they all had one thing in common...a parent or parents who truly believed in them. They are ALL remarkable kids! It was an honor and a privilege to be a witness to all they have accomplished at just 17-18 years of age.
The word drought conjures up pictures of desolate areas, such as deserts or Africa. However, it is a natural phenomenon and means a long period of time without sufficient water supply. That’s not to say it doesn’t rain, but that it doesn’t rain enough. After three very dry years, the UK is now offically in a drought and it seems that a couple of weeks heavy rainfall will not bring us out — despite it being the wettest April since records began!
It was my third pregnancy and I sat across from my midwife at my 37-week check-up. “I don’t think the baby has turned,” I told her. “I think she’s still breach.”
“Stop this. What is wrong with you?”
What's more alarming than going back 15 years funding for education, is the lack of educators who are (1) registered voters (2) registered votes who vote and (3) who contact their elected officials to express their concerns. My call to my fellow educators, we have to be the voice of our students. We must be their advocates when no one else will. We have to be our biggest advocates. We are our biggest hindrance in the process. How can we promote social justice in our classrooms and urge our students to become productive citizens of this great nation, if we, ourselves, are not willing to speak up. The time is now. Speak up, educators, speak up!
PS–Though a reader may not see it, there is a clear direction to all of this. While I have not been able to foresee all the twists and turns to this, the overall direction has remained stable. It has been much like driving through a city without a map, but with a visible and vibrant downtown rising above it all toward which all the various turns are directed. Even when I seem to go away away from that destination, it is in order to get back to a path that will take me all the more surely to it. It feels a bit like the conceptual equivalent of navigating Miami.
It’s the sort of question which comes after all the preliminary stuff, all the catching-up with an old friend who I haven’t seen in a couple of years. Your best friends are like that: able to ask the same question that everyone asks, but have it mean something more.
“He was so good I got him to turn professional at 16 and got him a fight in South Africa with Frank Warren on a World Title bill. But he was nothing but trouble. Naseem Hamed hated him. I had to pull them apart once at the club. I tried to help him but I don’t win them all. It’s so sad.”
Now let me share with you what I have come up with.
_____Women are strange creatures, you can stare at them all day long and they just kinda divert your attention, but take a picture of their feet and all hell breaks loose.
Wishing you a wonderful weekend wherever you may be and whatever you may be up to?
the show in advance rates.
Already drunk
The joy of hearing my mother-tongue again is overrun by the doubt about what I am drinking and especially by the perception of a strange tension in the air, as if something were about to happen.
Hope in the Lord, whose mighty hand
The rising price of cost of goods sold can be explained by the augmenting cost of commodity prices world-wide. However, as demonstrated in the graph below, Coca-Cola stock is riding a positive trend. Investors still have faith that the company will still generate enough of a profit, particularly the economy showing distinct signs of life (the Dow hit a 4-year high today), bolstered by strong manufacturing and consumer reports, to account for the rising price of sugar.
Listen to The Cribs - In The Belly of The Brazen Bull out May 15th below.
I am a crisis junkie.
If the concert is sold out, make sure you buy some of the special stamps that the French post office have produced. The stamp costs 1 Euro with 44 cents going directly to the French Red Cross. Not in France? Try buying some directly via internet!
The Pawnee National Grassland
9/22 – Colorado Springs, CO – The Black Sheep
Advil PM 16ct $1/1
21. bugs
"my head hurts like a bowling ball being squeezed by a giant's fingers" (paraphrased, but it's in the first paragraph of the 3rd chapter if you don't believe me)
Now I have to go pee. You should probably go pee too.
I’m planning ROADTRIP 2.0 as this summer’s vacation. We need to check in on some family members and friends, and I really need to get away from my hometown (which is starting to feel less like home than it did 15 years ago when I left). I’m the type of girl who loves to stay on the move. I just want to make sure I move with swagger, not an extra helping of strawberry cheesecake.
Our Barrett 50 cals will put you in the ground.
I do realize that most people are probably thinking health food but....
Make sure the garlic is well cooked and starts to get soft before you add some white wine to flavor the garlic further.
we humbly ask
But just when you think you’ve fallen through the grading curve. Something awesome happens and it pushes you up a notch. You get the “+”.
Note: Mom is navigating a rush hour traffic Rotary in a standard shift car. Can't...safely...reach...radio...
The fallacy arises because Conservatives are seen as reactionary, and care only about rules and the 'right way' of doing things. The word "staunch" springs to mind instantly for me. Socialists, on the other hand care about a thing called "society", and that must be good right? See how caring they are?
n a discussion thread on Facebook about a Swiss lawyer’s comments on Singaporeans not being ‘entitled to jobs in their own country’, Mr Tan argued that it is not the job of the government to protect the jobs of Singaporeans and bemoaned the poor quality of Singapore workers:
I’ll instill my wander with intent.
If someone wants to give me beers of this caliber off their own back, then they'll be a friend for life, so Dom, your pretty awesome in my book. I hope the beers I gave you in exchange do you right and I'll give my thanks once again.
I saw him perform three times, and each time fell just that little bit more in love with the man, the voice, the attitude.
FOR THE MERINGUE
Let us take a moment to describe what Human Resources Management really is.
pull the shells apart
We took the cheap looking marble window seal out and cased out the window. I don't do well with curtains... I just don't like them. We had faux blinds but I am not a huge fan of those either. We went with a cheaper shade and I actually love it. So easy to roll up and let the light shine in. One day I wouldn't mind having shutters but they are way expensive. When we finish redoing the rest of the house... maybe we will purchase them for all of the front windows... who knows. Until then... I really do like the shade! :)
Nationalisation of industries has flopped wherever it has been tried.
I managed everything without medication. I continued to do well in school. I concentrated on my work, and everything worked out. I thought that I could do this perpetually and be all right.
To say I am proud of my son would be such an understatement.He is kind beyond measure, thoughtful,loving, generous and did I mention handsome? LOL! He is a HUGE blessing in my life. Truth be told, I am in awe of him and his abilities. He is a great son, a fabulous man, and an all around wonderful human being.
It is also easy to get lost in the minutiae of the emails and text messages submitted to the Leveson Inquiry – who said what to whom and with whose authorisation – and miss what James Murdoch’s said in his actual testimony. Which is clear as day. When asked why he was so hostile to the deal being referred to the Competition Commission, James Murdoch replied: “It’s incredibly inefficient for us, for the company, to be waiting on what appeared to be an indefinite process, actually, with uncertain outcomes“.
The inside of the chateau contains three floors, with enough rooms to make you wonder how this was a house, and not a hotel! As you can see, the decor ranged from fairly simplistic to unbelievably ornate:
indeed
who flings
I raided my fabric swatches for something that coordinated with the Kids/Guest Bathroom, and found this sample. I had checked it out from JoAnn Fabrics ages ago for $5, and apparently never taken it back. I'm assuming that means I paid for it, and it's mine? Hope so, because my stool is wrapped in it.
“The importance of a much older form of commons in these revolts has earned scant attention—the public spaces where citizens rally to voice their discontent, show their power and ultimately articulate a new vision for their homelands.” –Jay Walljasper
Yep me too!
"A hand job," Harry replied.
Nobody wants to hear bad news. There is enough of it on here, what with furends getting sick and going over the Bridge and other money problems with some of our families and stuff. So we have been pretty quiet. We just purray hard for our furends in need and for something mama calls for-ti-tude for us.
Bid goodbye to all your fellow adventurers, wish them the luck of the Irish, and enjoy one last breakfast in your castle home!Transfers to Airport
So fresh and bright and sunny.
7. Milli Vanili was framed.
Unfortunately, what Maria Talks, Planned Parenthood and others are telling our daughters is that making a life-changing decision like abortion and getting a secret judicial bypass (not to mention the abortion itself) is easier than having to tell their parents about it.
So today, we're featuring the work of budding young jewelry artist Ashlynn Storey. In time, I'm sure we'll be seeing her in galleries throughout Wisconsin and all around the world. ;) Here's your name in lights my sweet darling!!! May you achieve all your dreams! xo ~Auntie Dawn
“We did not know that they (opposition leaders) were going to speak. I cannot control what they say,” she said amidst reports that opposition leaders had incited the crowd to breach the barriers at Dataran Merdeka during Bersih 3.0.
They can also be members of the angelic hierarchy, or highly evolved beings that we have yet to learn of.
Is blogging passé? I've read a couple of pieces recently suggesting it is and I can't say I agree.
We have a school yard behind our house, and the sprinklers go off almost every evening to water it. Which also helps us: some of the water gets sprayed over the fence and into our yard.
I've also just seen that the producers of The Hangover films are thinking of making it a trilogy.
There's a very cruel story by the French writer Villiers de L'Isle-Adam called 'Torture by Hope'. It's about a man imprisoned in a dungeon by the Spanish Inquisition. He is going to be tortured by them the following day. Then he notices that his cell door has been left unlocked. What a mistake by his jailers! Bursting with hope, he opens the door and creeps down the corridor towards the exit. He is almost free! Suddenly an inquisitor jumps out and cries, “Tricked you!” (I'm paraphrasing, please understand). It turns out that the prisoner had been allowed to escape that far, or rather that the illusion of escape was given to him as part of the torture, for to fill someone with false hope is the worst torment.
This house is not worth the $4 million the bank’s owed. I would recommend it at $2 million, I guess, and, if someone really wanted this location, maybe $2.5, but that’s it. I’m sure there’s been far more money sunk in here than that, between land and construction costs, but it shouldn’t have been. I understand how a builder could let his optimism override his good sense; how could a local bank be so blind?
At the very, very...last minute, just when our schedules couldn't take one more activity...E.K. and I decided to sign up our children for baseball. BOY played T-ball a couple of years ago, which was somewhat of a disaster. Between lack of focus and interest, it was rather torturous for him and his parents... There was a lot of cloud watching and playing in the infield dirt.
Now you're looking at my newest purchase ~ meet Mama Bunny and her two Bunny Foo Foos.
For greater contrast I also added RV29 around the outer edges of the strawberries and BG96 on the inner parts of the leaves. Using my medium tone markers to blend.
for lack of a better word. He can go from Cinderella to Die Hard to
Marvel CEO Isaac “Ike” Perlmutter, who owns 37% of Marvel stock, also secured himself the top job overseeing the Marvel business after the acquisition. That includes decisions on which characters are developed into movie stars.
Here's the pic from the Craigslist ad. It's a white sleigh-bed style crib. I love it! It needs some work, definitely a new paint job, but it was $40 and it's solid wood. Score!
What do you do when you find yourself in that predicament?
What do y'all have planned for the weekend? Here's hoping for more sunshine!
Spire Publishing’s Premier package is pretty much the same as the Professional package with the addition of ebook. The package is priced at £899.
Sturdiness: Buy an organizer that will be able to carry all the paper, ribbon, invite samples and other items you want to hold on to. You want a binder that’s strong and not made of paper, plastic or other weak material that may warp or break with the weight.
I was trying to talk about octane with spouseinbox the other day and realized my limited knowledge on the subject. That being the case, I looked up an article on the subject and discovered that my thought of it being a mixture of 2,2,4 trimethylpentane with heptane was partially right.
Two years ago I treated Simon to a ride in what's called the 'Ring taxi' - a ride around the Nürburgring in a BMW driven by an experienced racing driver, it's something I'd love to do, but just standing there, in the pits with all the street cars, bikes, vans (basically anything with an engine and wheels can take a turn) racing their engines as they waited their turn to enter the track took me straight back to my youth. The smell is amazing, an intoxicating mix of hot rubber, oil, petrol, exhaust fumes and adrenaline, there's nothing like it.
Seventh Doctor Season 26
I usually catch the 11:41 or 12:41 train, and I'm at work by about 12-til. Yes, it's a five minute train ride. If I have a lesson at the next hour, it's busy-time for me, as I change shoes, put on my pin, nametag, and tie clip, and prep the lesson. Otherwise, I take my time and start prepping for the day.
This means that on Sunday you need to come back here and use the links below to take you to all the stores that are offering these amazing FREE products.
A few days ago, the terrorist Osama bin Laden was killed by US Special Forces at his hideaway in northern Pakistan. In the US and other coalition countries, it was a time for much reflecting. Bin Laden had been leading a small group of dedicated terrorists on a campaign of violence for many years before the horrific events of 9/11 brought him and al Qaeda into the forefront of American consciousness. Some 2,977 Americans lost their lives that day. The heart of our military complex was pierced, and arguably the most identifiable of American symbols was destroyed in America's most important city. More than that, virtually every American was forced to confront some basic facts about our security and our standing among the nations of the world. As Americans, we are raised to believe that we are invincible, that we are right, and that we have a responsibility to keep the world safe from a wide variety of ideologies that we believe to be evil. The events of 9/11 gave us pause to question.
But the lunch was great, and the conversation never stopped
Thank you for making my life interesting though. It's never a dull moment when y'all are around.
In a small frying pan, melt the butter over low heat, and sauté the garlic for 30-45 seconds, making sure it does not burn. Stir in the mint just to coat it with the warm garlic, then pour the contents of the frying pan into the soup pot. Taste, adjust with salt and black pepper as needed, and serve hot.
- 2 medium onions, roughly chopped
has been
This is an annual show that Oklahoma Christian (my old school) puts on. Every "club" (because it's a private school, they don't do sororities/frats) spends the first two months of spring semester creating a show. Basically, they re-write popular songs and come up with choreographed routines. Clubs LIVE for Spring Sing.
The kids LOVED it. (plus they learned somethin' too :) We started off by filling out this chart while we read the story. It made it easier to create the end product AND we found ALL (or all I could find) of the examples not just one of each.
So when you are having a bad day
324 15. “On Prophecy and Freedom.” Greek Star, Chicago, Illinois, August 5, 1999, pp. 7-8., August 12, 1999, p. 8. (Sources: Item C-1998 (12), above, pp. 521-30, Item D-XI/9/1991, below.)
As the lone undefeated team left in the Volleyball Championships, CSUSB was chosen to host the tournament, which should give the Coyotes a sizeable advantage playing in front of a growing fan base.
17. Heartache Tonight
and above that
Will God allow his children, his kingdom co-heirs, or the trophies of his glory to be overcome or destroyed? “Fear not, little flock, for it is your Father’s good pleasure to give you the kingdom”.
One was deemed fit for work during a work capability assessment, despite having a deteriorating chronic illness, and lost both incapacity benefit and disability living allowance.
Reels just need to have the capacity to hold the line and balance the rod. We can make suggestions from Sage, Waterworks-Lamson, TFO and Orvis.
Unfortunately, your body and your fat do not have a linear, two-step relationship. Instead, think of your body as an orchestra. All of its systems, organs, muscles, cells, fluids, hormones, and chemicals play different instruments, make different sounds (your intestines have dibs on first-chair tuba), and produce different results depending on how you use them. They work independently, but only when they’re played together can you appreciate the magnificent symphony of your own biology. As the conductor of your biological orchestra, you control how the instruments interact and what the final result will be.
My rating: 2.5/5
Your eyes coruscate with ambition and intelligence. You have more than one worthy goal.
Fitness goals have definitely improved as well! We have both increased our level of fitness and today I’m pleased to say that after already running 4 miles, I noticed I had slowed down, so with 2 miles left to go I picked up the pace and completed my 6 mile run in a faster pace then my previous time! I’m pumped!!
So, I am taking four quarters and putting them in this envelope right now.
I heard a lot of Tom Jones growing up and this song is no exception. Funny thing is Tom Jones used to remind me of my dad first, but now any Tom Jones song reminds me of John Mulaney’s “What’s New Pussycat” bit first.
1. Brew a 5 cup pot of water
And he pulled out our food processor.
Could it be she specializes in one type of writing over another?
In short, a called dog is called by its master to a purpose. A driven dog is driven by itself or by fear of others. Both dogs arrive at the end. Both may have wonderful intentions. The difference is not a difference in intent or morality.
This is one of the most exciting of The New Testament. Paul writes that “if the Spirit of him who raised Jesus from the dead is living in you, he who raised Christ from the dead will also give life to your mortal bodies through his Spirit, who lives in you.” (Romans 8:11)
When local television stations have shown copies of the list in news reports, they have blurred the image or used extreme close-ups that do not convey any personal details.
There are a couple of companion cards to this one that I'll have to show you next time... I got a boat to catch!
This past summer, my husband Peter, my daughter Julie and I hiked to a very still and quiet little pond in the White Mountains of New Hampshire….Greeley Pond. It was sooo quiet and still….just remarkable.
Anyway. Britain ran out of salt. Rationed, it was. Highways agency demanding counties which had salt to relinquish it, in favour of those which had not remembered to buy any. A yellow jacketed bloke snatched the salt shaker out of my hand as I prepared to enjoy my fried egg sarny, "Sorry mate, requisitioned" He was assigned, I believe, to be strapped to the bonnet of Lord Mandelson's official conveyance and strew salt in its path.
After they left, I completed a Scrapbookgraphics work project. Then Kari and Julia and I went on an hour long walk. I guess that was good, right?
My first trip was with my step-Dad to Out of the Ordinary in Cambridge. It's a darling little spot, loaded to the brim and almost bursting with all things miniature for every sort of miniature dream you can come up with. The owner was kind enough to come and open the shop on a Monday, a day she is normally closed, just for me to browse and have my pick of things! It was so much fun!
So, this week please make a project that has something to do with SCHOOL!
To take the right steps
Most quiet need, by sun and candle-light.
An employer-paid policy typically offers a coverage amount equal to one’s annual salary or a modest flat amount, says Butch Britton, CEO of ING U.S. Insurance (ING). That may prove insufficient: In addition to medical and funeral bills, your loved ones may need to pay off debts such as a mortgage and provide for other basic financial needs for years to come.
They are the ones supporting Miscavige’s empty real estate empire.
Realist Beige (pink undertones) or Popular Gray (gray undertones).....
Beginning Lindy with Jasmine Cheung & Sam Chan 7:30 to 8:30
Fourteen designers create a new piece each week in three different variations (mostly just color differences), and three different buyers - one from H&M, Macy's and Saks Fifth Avenue - decide if they want to buy the designer's pieces. If they do, then those designs can be bought the next days in that store. If a store buys your design, you're safe for the week. If not, you're up for elimination. The judges are allowed to save one person from the bottom three, and the buyers decide which of the bottom two goes home. Sort of hard to explain through text, but if you see the show, it's a lot more understandable.
I wanted to live in Australia and with the procedure that i explained in the past posts, I was able to achieve this enormous objective.
This is where the old is ending
Revelation 8
Thanks guys! My answers are in the comments!
Also, if you have a Yukata or a Happi wear it to the event!♪ （^ω^）
The funeral was held two days later at the temple near my house. When you arrive at a funeral, the first thing you do is sign in at Reception. Then you hand over your condolence money. Depending on your relation to the deceased, or the relation of the person you know to the deceased (example, when I went to a teacher's fathe's funeral, the relation would have been father) the amount in the envelope increases. I believe the highest is around $500 US.
"Do you need some more swats?"
Take it from me
Rolling Stones As tears go by UK
JA: Whatever makes you and your life original and beautiful.
Obama’s main argument for why Israel and its American friends should trust him on Iran is because he has been Israel’s most dependable ally all along. Look at my record, he’s argued. I believe Obama is a friend—but a problematic friend. True, security cooperation with Israel has been excellent, which is at least partly a result of George W. Bush’s agreement with Israel to enhance military cooperation over this decade – though Obama went farther than Bush in one crucial respect, providing Israel with bunker busters, which Bush withheld.
Underneath the deck was a hot mess of weeds and bizare looking insects and it was honestly kind of odd to me why the builder didn't put concrete there. Knowing we would have a hard time growing anything underneath should we attempt to do so, it seemed like an obvious (not to mention maintenance free) solution to have a concrete slab poured. We ended up finding a concrete company who also did decorative concrete as well, so we had a stamped concrete patio poured at the same time. We spend a lot of time outside and knew this would be a worthwhile investment. I happened to be home over the several days that they poured the patio and it was really neat to see the whole process. I will admit though, that as they were pouring the cement into the framework, I was freaking out because it looked nothing like the color of concrete I chose (that I spent hours agonizing over). It was dark. And ugly. And sort of permanent.Here it looked dark red-brown, almost like a terra cotta planter. I wasn't a fan at this point.
hold anger for you
Jim Ludwick, a self-described average American, gets up early each morning and heads out to warm up his truck. “I cut wood, fix fences, and work with my dog,” said Ludwick. On other days, Ludwick breaks trail in his snow-covered driveway and heads for the State Capitol in Salem, Oregon.
Campsite #6 is a nice little ridgetop site, with room for just a few tents and a nice fire ring for sitting beside. We got our tents up in a jiffy and made dinner (ramen, spam, trail mix & granola bars) then sat around the fire and chatted.
The disturbing trend had led forces from across the country to collaborate to halt the supply of drugs.
for former rain to croon.
3. Pour 1 tablespoon of oil into large nonstick skillet; place over medium-high heat until hot. Fry half of pot stickers in hot oil for 3 minutes or until golden brown on bottom. Add 1/2 cup chicken broth; reduce heat to medium. Cover and cook for about 8 minutes until tender.
After returning home from Vietnam in 1969, Powell was drawn into another Vietnam controversy involving the killing of civilians. In a court martial, Powell sided with an Americal Division general who was accused by the Army of murdering unarmed civilians while flying over Quang Ngai province.
The focus on “our” in this reading of Acts leads to a type of anger that is not good. Why? Because it is exclusionary. Peter and Paul in this passage are showing a concern for the potential of injustice. Much like Jesus overthrowing the tables in the temple, there are moments when anger is right. When we see injustice, oppression, and exploitation we should feel anger. Not to the point of doing violence (i.e. physical harm) to someone, but to speak and act in a way that reveals the injustice, oppression, and exploitation for what it is. Not only that, our words and actions need to move past merely revealing these things. It has to move to the point of outright confronting…because they are wrong and evil.
It was of no added advantage that the place was so frigging hot! A thousand plus bodies with the attendant body heat was no picnic. The man was saying something about “parties to a suit” I was paying no attention. The girl drooling beside me held more interest; the guy in front of me was fiddling with an i-pad the dude to my left was fighting sleep with little success, and the chic in front of me was day dreaming, her eyes seemed glazed. I wonder what she was thinking about.
There's a "manufactured" horror here, one they think real horror comprises, rather than what it actually contains. Henry Rollins screams about real horror. The disillusionment of genuine black metal, screaming about a "loss of faith and the hysterical fear and sadness it contains," (Ratliff again) sounds that horror. Even Bad Religion evoke a real freaking out in the face of modern life.
I rented this DVD from my college library.
My sweet sister in law found out she had a brain tumor right before Christmas and had it removed. She is fine and it wasn't cancerous or anything, but you can imagine how scary that was.
Nelson Mandela: Speech on Release from Prison, 1990
All that changed the day after December 7th, 1941 with the news of the Japanese attacks on the Hawaiian Island, men who a few days before wanted nothing to do with war found themselves standing in lines for hours in an effort to sign up and defend their country. My own grandfather attempted to enlist twice but was declare “4F” both times because he was completely deaf in one ear after suffering through a severe case of the mumps as a child.
The king my father gave you such a ring.
It's always fun to get pictures from costumers. Some days I sew and sew and sew and it just feels disconnected but when a cute little photo appears in my inbox or is posted to my facebook page like this one is it's such a fun reminder that each of my little creations are going to be worn by real life cutie pies.
Just to make her happy,
Marco was working the room, doing his thing:
And my Grandfather Paco was a true gentleman also. There he would be alongside my Grandmother helping prepare all the dishes that would be spread out on the dining room table by six o’clock on December 31st., including desserts all made by hand.
the past. Some of you have heard me say my painful afflictions (Fibromyalgia,Osteoarthritis,Neuropathy,Carpal Tunnel,Migraines,Tmj,Ankolosing Spondolytis,Hiatal Hernia,Gerd) &
Jl. Kemang Raya 47C, Kemang, 12730 Jakarta
My son is a keen amateur astronomer and the other day I tried to take a photograph of the moon through the eye piece of his telescope. While it didn't turn out quite as I'd hoped, I like this photograph all the same.
Nose: Marmalade, fruit cake, malt, oak, menthol, brown sugar. Sounds sweet but there is a bitter element as well. Water enhances the menthol and oak.
I’ve got to find somebody to help me
and got the snow tires switched out on the car,
Here are the deets:
Finding the past and reliving the memories. Pure joy. Every second spent grafting away was spent in heaven.
As I write though, the less I need to do the “processing” part. As I have started to write down my ideas, more and more ideas seem to be born. Maybe tomorrow, I write some new stuff again!
Schwab 1000 (minimum waived with 100 auto contribution)
Just a quick post late Sunday night on my card I created for my Mom. These soft pretty colors remind me so much of her and the colors she wears a lot and looks best in. She had tears when she saw this card and the handwritten note inside.
Please welcome our SPARKS design team!
Although the Colonies declared sovereignty from British rule, the colonists did not achieve freedom or recognition as the United States of America immediately. Internal and external conflicts continued for decades.
And his life was never the same.
Hearings one week earlier examined the evidence of Corrective Services' elite ESG officers, most of whom had their identities protected. The video of Kevin Spratt's reception at Casuarina Prison was played to the CCC hearing and then in the days following, it was publicly released, in accord with Mr Spratt's wishes. The 6 September 2008 CCTV video showed Mr Spratt being extracted from a Perth Watch-House cell by the heavily armoured and masked ESG officers, and the naked and unarmed man is heard praying for his life, and tasered 11 times by two senior ESG officers.
- Do you like my clothes and think they will be a great gift for someone but don’t know what the right size or color would be?
The middle aged woman's love was evident........
“This is no very striking resemblance of your own character, I am sure. How near it may be to mine, I cannot pretend to say. You think it a faithful portrait, undoubtedly.” (Good! The man is no namby-pamby. He can be a bit testy when someone pushes him. That means he will forgive my sometimes very snarky remarks.)
It’s not so far from today’s society where people watch other people’s lives on TV to get a vicarious thrill. I’m talking about the Reality shows that are not really reality, but are orchestrated. (Not to mention how we’re all needy and watch “news” 24 hours a day.)
and decided that my legs would make
Your fan,
What are the things that you want right now? If you were to sit down with a piece of paper and pen and create your list of “I want’s”, what things would be on your list?
Emmy is still on the crutches,her foot is feeling a bit better though.
Israel again ran the odds of waiting until next January when they have support or just getting it over with now.
So I booked my trip to Istanbul to meet my parents there in October. Then, while in London I heard about these bombings that this Kurdish group is doing, specifically to scare tourists. AND I made the mistake of telling my mom about it. How the fuck am I uspposed to know the US news has mentioned NOTHING about it and so my mom didn't know anything and now she's all freaked out and wants to talk to the agent about cancelling their trip? Like, hello, there's bombings everywhere, if you cancelled your trip every time a bomb went off, you'd just stay home and never even go grocery shopping. So now I'm all, great, they are gonna cancel and i am stuck witha $500 non refundable ticket. THEY got travel cancellation insurance. I don't think Dad will let Mom wimp out, he's too excited about going back to his old stomping ground from his youth, but I am so annoyed at the American attitude that if you leave the US you are gonna DIE. (And MOM you are NOT American!) Americans have gotten frozen by the news that gets piped into them wherever they turn. The Brits? They just say "Eh. That's the world. It's not stopping me." And off they go. Livinng life. The chances of dying from a bomb are so much less than a car crash or a plane crash or probably even getting stuck by lightning.
Princes and presidents could not have paid any amount to assure an experience akin to what we experienced on our trip. It was a memorable experience and one of the highlights of our journey through India.
4. Mahoromatic: Automatic Maiden
Fluff the flowers as much as you please!
It has recently been revealed, that a secret unit of the Australian military’s elite Special Air Service (SAS) have been deployed on “dozens” of illegal spying operations inside a number of African countries over the past year. The missions, including in Zimbabwe, Kenya and Nigeria, have been “assessing border controls, exploring landing sites for possible military interventions and possible escape routes for the evacuation of Australian nationals and military assessments of local politics and security.”
God's sovereign power is in no danger whatever.
And now here is a young son in your place,
Patti
Taken 06/15/2010
Some of you asked about my morning Greek yogurt (that I pair with granola when I'm not eating oatmeal), and Oikos honey is my favorite, even though I usually pour a little of the honey out so it's not too sweet. It's got 13 grams of protein.
1) Identify railyards, rail lines, and highways that coincide with sustainable development and have the capacity for anticipated growth
Tell me, have you ever danced with the devil in the pale moonlight?
Working Writer’s Club members will automatically receive an invite to this workshop and if you are not a Working Writer’s Club member register at the Working Writer’s Club.
07) Thru The Eyes Of Ruby
that he would definitely giveus a chance to design his project in France.
Least anyone misunderstand my rant, if you want to start a business and you're stuck for a way to promote it and you have a contact at the NYTimes, awesome, get money or in this case, Rock the Casbah. But IMO for the New York Times to essentially provide advertising space to a private business that has consultants, is appropriating something already in existence is unfortunate when you imagine the thousands if not millions of stories that go on in New York City every day. Even in Bodegas.
myself and my mates were younger the Monsters of Rock festival at Castle Donnington was one of the highlights of the year. These days it is called the Download festival. It didn't really matter who was on, we would hire a Transit van and pile as many people and as much beer as we could and usually be lathered before we even got there.
So his dad decided to come over and helped his son hang a back door and after that they went for a good walk with the dog. His life has turned around again because he has decided to live his life instead of just dying at home.
Cult She sells sanctuary UK
A middle aged woman who had laughter, strength, and life returned to her eyes.....
That “torpedo” had caught us all unaware, and the initial fear was that we had run into a rather large gator. As we looked back we watched the unmistakable finned tail and fin come swooping out of the water and realized we had just had a close encounter with one of the few river dolphins that glide the waterways of the Everglades.
Be kind. Encouraging the people who work with you and showing enthusiasm for the work you’re doing together will influence them to choose the same kind attitudes. Every day, try to do something to make the day better for each of the people you encounter, from writing encouraging notes to speaking words of praise or doing some small acts of service to help others.
“Please, Livvy. Jackson’s a biologist. I’m a physicist. It was doomed from the start.”
Ted Hughes wrote a number of poems that touched on the Men of the North, and I’ve collected some samples below. Warning to our Danish readers: this is modern poetic English! It may try your skills a bit, but your efforts will be rewarded. I made my way through the Holger story in Danish, so fair is fair; now it’s your turn.
2. The Wire
-Travis Browne is now rated #9 at heavyweight, ahead of Brock Lesnar and Fabricio Werdum. Browne remains undefeated, and now it’s time to put him against an elite (top 10) opponent to see what he’s really capable of.
Would I do it again? Bring it on!
3. I'm A Hog For You Baby
Because my 2 little ones have not decided to EVER sleep at the same time during the day...I have not had one moment to update the blog and SOOO much has happened! The first 4 weeks of Violets life seemed to be pretty simple...she was a very sleepy baby...I would have the hardest time keeping her awake! she was probably 2 weeks old before she had her first one hour of full awake time! Anyway when she turned 4 weeks old that's when all the drama began!!.....Because I had Violet at home, we didn't get the mandated hearing test done in the hospital like most baby's do...so within 2 weeks of her birth we had a letter from the state in our mail box saying that we needed to go get her hearing test done at the health department ASAP!!...well...she had been responding to noise just fine and because of that I honestly kept putting it off. But I knew it was something that was required in the state of Oklahoma....so when she was about a month old we finally got to the health department...only to have the speech pathologist tell us that she failed her hearing test on her right ear and that she was referring us to an audiologist...WHAT?!?! what does that even mean?...does that mean she is deaf in her right ear?...I was in total shock! Jake was blown away and we were practically silent all the way home. We trusted in Gods plan for Violets life...but it is so hard to hear that something might be wrong! Our audiologist appointment was set for 2 weeks later, and we spent the next 2 weeks praying for her ear and for her little life. Finally our appointment came...and after 3 hours of tests on my little violet...it turned out to be a complete fluke and she can hear perfect out of BOTH ears!!! Praise God!!!
......until it was time for a wash. It takes a lot of effort to keep that fur sparkling white :-)
Fezariu grows up among the soldiers and becomes one of them. He thinks his time with the mercenaries has hardened him. But a campaign in his old home town pushes him too far, and he discovers what really happened to his mother. Maybe there are some things money shouldn't buy... and maybe it's time Fezariu took his revenge.
Eggs! Some of you might have prepared some variation of a singing time using plastic Easter eggs. Because I need something truly simple this week, I am (probably) using plastic eggs and "Titles and Tricks". But I am posting this week because I wanted to share a wonderful link to another post that touched me. Our loving Heavenly Father knows and blesses each of us, according to our need and as we are open to his ministering.
Orange or lemon zest
The leaders of the Christina Zionists, Hagee, Robertson, and a hundred more are the knights and barons at the head of the Crusades’ columns. Their loot comes in the mail and from credit card contributions from the peasant’s foot soldiers.
Previously we know Steve’s wife has been abducted by a government facility established on an unknown island and Steve, Big Joe and Ethan’s Team tried to rescue her but unfortunately due to Sandra’s betrayal they are captured by Colonel John Bellamy’s team.
You can't help but have high expectations of Charcut after all the press and accolades it's received, so yes, I expected more than I got. At $115 for lunch (before tip) for three people, and no liquor, I'm a little hesitant to try again, but I remain optimistic.
I had a ROUGH week last week. How I lost 3 pounds, I am not quite sure. I broke down on Friday and had a bagel with cream cheese and pizza. Holy carbs! And then on Saturday during my break from work I had a double cheese burger and fries from McDonalds. Disgusting, I know. However, I did manage to get out and walk 3.5 miles twice during the week and I have been pretty good at not snacking, so somehow it all balanced itself out. I am not excusing the junk food though. I made poor choices and felt horrible after. Not worth it.
3) Then answer these questions about your significant other.
For all those footy tragics, and by which in this week in Melbourne I mean Collingwood supporters, I offer the following. This occurred to me as I sat quietly enjoying a beer or two after the AFL Grand Final ended in a draw after the Magpies appeared to have the game in the bag – a ‘cake walk’, if you will.
Do not be fooled, fellow chicken keepers, winter will soon be upon us.
No sooner was he out of sight and earshot when the foliage broke as a massive Wood Elf contingent broke cover on both sides of the lane and attacked in sudden and deadly ambush; not one, but two of the frightening Bloodwood Drakes in their ranks.
It is good to note however that the data being represented is between 1884 and 2007. This increase in average global temperature doesn’t necessarily mean that we are just going to see warmer and warmer weather. It tends to mean that we observe more severe weather more frequently (more droughts and floods for example). Car emissions are thought to be a contributor to this phenomenon which is why I have chosen to try to change my personal driving habits to lower my contribution to global warming.
5 ) When you get an email from your girlfriend saying that she thinks you should start seeing other people…because she already is.
This explains why Israel, as a nation, did not accept the offer of the Kingdom in early Acts. They were blinded. We see this in Romans 11:25.
Sterile sports bar. Utterly average and vaguely pleasant all the way around. Lots of TVs and an interactive trivia game. Quite a few beers on tap, but few of any real interest – I think 1554, Sam Adams Octoberfest, and Guinness were my top 3. A bit far from our house to become a regular spot.
And she blushes and turns away to hide it. And the other girls cajole her: Em-ma! Em-ma!
The Lord has said:
We're back from a wonderful weekend in Philly/south Jersey.
Central Park and city
no one will care.
Congratulations, boys, on getting your own place set up. Any chance we'll be seeing some legal versions of Popcorn's brandies?
Round one 31st May 2012
Celery - some (I think this may have been about 3 ribs)
Who’s on Top?
With our bad feet and one bad back.....
Approaching the castle, it appears to squat despondently, looming large until the massive walls dominate the view. Flocks of cawing crows and jackdaws buffeted by the wind in the sullen sky only add to the sense of eerie and timeless remoteness. But like much of the coastline here, it also feels transient, ephemeral. Up close, the stonework is crumbling (so much so that, despite renovation work in recent years, it is now only open for guided tours), the individual blocks of sandstone and Caen limestone heavily weathered, gradually dissolving, the flesh wasting away to leave a skeleton of mortar. The entrance is padlocked shut, such that I am only able to view the crumbling keep fleetingly from behind barred gates, or through decaying window arches in the D-shaped bastions. But it seems an appropriate way to visit: the castle still retains its sense of foreboding and impenetrability.
Anwaar: Who could that be? I don’t understand why Professor Rashib would come back so early.
For the fourth installment of 'Bromantic Interludes', we are very lucky to be graced by the presence of Todd from Primitive Future (left - yes, of course that's actually him). I basically lifted the whole "guest mix" idea from Todd and P-Future, so I'm especially stoked on his contribution here.
This is love. This is peace. This is where I come when I am lost so that I can be found. This is why I come back to my yoga mat time and time again. Come dance with me.
never leaving me,
exact formulas, but because He is a You that comes forward and gets Himself recognized. The intelligence can try to build concepts that define true contents. But this, according to Ratzinger, is a theology that claims of dissect the mystery, not a theology that kneels. And such theology already didn’t interest him then. In the dialect of Bavaria we would say: it wasn’t his
Cute huh? I just cannot wait to decorate that baby! And one of the best parts about her? She has a GAS stove. I am in heaven. No more electric stink tops for us.
"NO IT ISN'T!" wept my girl.
White Eagle might have been an Indian, or a Savage, according to Anna, but he was a gentleman even when she lashed out at him, fighting for her freedom. I couldn’t help but fall in love with him, and couldn’t wait to see where this unlikely couple would end up.
The options for a new symbol in Flash.
02. Novocain Rush
I went to Queens College CUNY and graduated with my Bachelors & Masters degree in Education. I've completed my 30 credits through online courses as well. I enjoy cooking, shopping, vacationing, and being with my family and friends...
I’m getting to that. Would you please shut up?
It was almost three weeks ago now that my little friend the stomach bug decided to take up residence in my intestines (WOW, this post is off to a great start already isn’t? I promise I won’t be gross…), but I am happy to say that I’m finally feeling back to normal (or at least close to it), and my lab test results came back clear. Yesterday I ate an entire burger at my favorite joint downtown, and truly… it was a mouthgasm. Ask my mom. I was almost in tears, it was so good. There was a little bit of grunting and groaning and cavewoman sounds going on. Don’t judge. You’d be doing the same thing if you’d been eating toast and applesauce for three weeks straight.
Too long film has been held hostage by the notion of the character, and the main character, or protagonist, in particular. This is not to say that film does not often become more powerful when it is focused by means of a unifying perspective, a single film-consciousness that serves as a tour guide through the film-world being portrayed. Alternately, a few such perspectives, or a series thereof, may serve as a focusing device. However, these tropes should be seen as means, not ends in themselves.
"The first rule of the game is to not get killed by the bad guys. Cause if you get killed, you're dead. And that's bad."
Uhhh, sorry about that. Just think how much we would've gotten if I'd let Savannah pack them away!
Only one in 40 black South Africans achieves the average I.Q. of his white fellow citizens. One in a hundred have the I.Q. to achieve university entrance requirements. That is why only one in ten blacks pass our dumbed down Matric (with a pass percentage of 30% in many cases). One in 6000 black grade one learners will pass Matric with both Maths and Science.
Finally kneel and pray?
my only pieces of criticism are that captain america still looks a bit crap (but i like they make a joke of it) and that hawkeye was sexier in the comic books, but that’s it. i know, i know, i must be the only hawkeye fan. stupid outfit and all. but i think i kind of have a thing for archers (legolas excluded). i find them rather sexy. green arrow was number 2 on my list. Also, going back to the film, i found it a bit heavy on the all-american pep talk, but that’s in the comics, too, so i can’t really complain; it was bound to be.
Florida A&M University is the nation’s largest Historically Black University, graduating more African Americans than any other university in the nation. The FAMU-NAA Black History Scholarship Luncheon has grown over the past 18 years to become one of the key events for Black History Month in Los Angeles. In that time, the FAMU NAA Southern California Alumni Chapter has raised more than $850,000 and provided scholarships to over 145 California students attending FAMU.
I then added various purple hues using czech glass beads and amethyst rounds on Vintaj Brass jump rings. I attached that to Vintaj Brass chain, and finally strung a beautiful lavender silk ribbon from Marsha Neal Studio through the chain.
Desmond-"It was nice bumping into ya."
Each year around the holidays I write a family newsletter, as I’m sure countless other families do. It is a way for my house to update the ones we love but don’t see regularly, and it is a way to show our deepest love and appreciation for all who receive it.
*For the ability to be home with him during this time.
“Right now I’ve got my curves back because I’ve had time off, I’m at home cooking, I’m more relaxed. I’m not defined by being seven pounds heavier than I was two months ago – I think it is really unhealthy to go there.”
Well-recommended!
Map makers over time
Of course, Republicans are just as guilty as Democrats when it comes to reducing arguments to bumper stickers. (Rep. Paul Ryan of Wisconsin has written that “the president’s economic experiment has failed. It is time to get back to what we know works.”) But the vast majority of Republicans, Ryan included, will at least acknowledge their ideological first principles — free markets, limited government, property rights. Liberals are terribly reluctant to do likewise. Instead, they often speak in seemingly harmless cliches that they hope will penetrate our mental defenses.
I ate a slice of bread last night and one this morning, and I didn’t throw them up. I hate bread. It’s stupid empty calories that are now sitting on my thighs. I wouldn’t ever buy bread for myself if it wasn’t specifically for a binge/purge session, but my flatmate hates the crusts so she leaves them for me, and as I’ve got about £2.50, a couple of kilo bags of dried pulses and a bag of potatoes to feed myself for the next ten days I’m not in a position to turn down free food. The same for the two picked onions she didn’t want, and the brown sauce another flatmate bought by mistake. I’m just hoping that my dad sends me a bit of money to buy course books for next year, so I can use a bit to get some vegetables. I can’t stand the thought of gaining weight, and that’s not why I’ve given up bulimia. I want to lose a few pounds, and I definitely don’t want to eat normally. I was such a good anorexic when I was younger and although I don’t want to go back there – I don’t want to die – I want to have the self-control to eat minimal amounts. If I start getting thunder thighs from all the running, food is going to have to take a running jump. I like my thigh gap, thank you very much.
Putting oneself in the place of the other,
5k run open category
all the flowers with different techniques.
Oh, Kyoto now
Assemblyman Darryl Towns (his father, Rep. Edolphus Towns, also supports the project) also spoke, along with City Council Members Darlene Mealy, Lew Fidler, and an energetic Dominic Recchia (right), all of whom represent districts comfortably distant from the project footprint.
she gives them
If you are reading a theological book and you do not belong to the faith, you can read it well by treating its dogmas with the same respect you treat the assumptions of a mathematician. If you do belong to the faith, then you are obliged to make sense out of it and find it true in one sense or another. If you cannot do this by yourself, then you are obliged to go to someone who can.
As you lay sleeping next to me, I can't believe how blessed I am to have you. I know you will be a great big brother. You're such a sweet, caring little boy and I can't imagine life without you. I look forward to this new chapter in our lives. We have until December to soak up the novelty of just having you as an "only child" and I hope to share many, many experiences with you before that time.
But while there’s not much to inspire disdain yet, there’s also not much to inspire praise. The art is pretty decent for its style, but the story thus far is pretty uninspired, and the humor is awfully hit-or-miss. I’m given to understand that the overall style of the work eventually changes in a way which makes it more interesting, but if you go into reading this particular volume wondering what made Dave Sim a significant figure in independent comics publishing, you might not actually find that question being answered.
More specifically (an alarmingly), our standardized tests show that our boys to score lower than girls in the realm of language arts.
To pass the buck a little further, NATO’s goals and end-game is handed over to Libya’s NTC, this way everyone’s asses are covered.
white.
By the way, the chirps this morning? After replacing batteries and even installing a new smoke-detector, we discovered the chirps were coming from our carbon monoxide detector, probably due to several power surges during the early morning hours. Go figure.
on time
~ Die cut letters
I visited the post office about a week ago to weigh my invitation to see how much postage would be. The kind gentleman responded "Oh! You're getting married...Why?" I smiled and was unsure if that was rhetorical or if that was standard response in DC. He said "Well, good luck with that. It will be $0.98." I smiled and explained that I was hoping they would come in under a dollar. I purchased my $1 stamps and left, prepared to put the finishing touches on my invites. After a week of wrapping and unwrapping invitations (silly mistakes - that's another story), I eventually finished a set of 37, complete with the ever so unattractive 'Rockefeller' $1 stamp. I smiled at the progress I made and looked forward to taking them to the post office first thing Wednesday morning.
Heartburn- Anne Cassidy and
David Levithan
We went to an egg hunt and meet the Easter Bunny event at a local kids’ clothing re-sale shop today. I came across an adorable baby-blue shirt emblazoned with “Rock Star” and a guitar. Of course, I had to get it!
SUGGESTIONS:
Moylan's Dragoons Dry Irish Stout
You want her chained forever
That Gentry, 18, will be collecting a paycheck makes him a rarity in today’s working world.
Keeper of the peace
The wonders of the world, mysteries, the most.
Article 23 An agriculture administrative department at the county level or above shall be responsible for the supervision and inspection of the safety of places of origin of agricultural products.
“Oh, I say, am I to understand that I am the first to be revealed to you?” With round, leathery leaves, the branch resembled a toddler toy with rings stacked on one another.
as the pianist
Lewis is one of the most prolific and popular performers working today. He executes a brilliant trifecta as stand-up comedian, actor and author. Receiving critical acclaim, he performs over 200 nights a year to sold out audiences throughout Europe, New Zealand, Canada and The United States. He is one of few performers to sell out multiple, renowned theatres, including Carnegie Hall, Lincoln Center, Brooks Atkinson Theatre, New York City Center and the MGM Grand in Las Vegas. In August 2007, he was the first stand-up comedian to ever perform in concert at the Walt Disney Concert Hall in Los Angeles.
Anyway, let’s go through the weekly wrap-up, shall we?
Do come back here for another fast card tomorrow as I return for Three Minute Thursday.
When you leave Fort Hood, the sign above the gate warns, You've Survived the War, Now Survive the Homecoming. It is eerily prescient.
Not feeling great, we went back to the room to nap. Later we walked to black rock and along the beach.
This weekend was, per usual, a good one, filled with mimosa-filled brunches and waffles and hanging out with friends who are finally on their way back to the city and finally getting my apartment to look less disheveled.
1. Mohd. Rafi: Pyar Hai Ik Nishan Qadmon Ka Part I
"I'm very surprised I've won both awards to be honest, but I'm absolutely delighted.
#7 - Joy of a Completed Page
And finally, if all the slots get claimed, I'll throw in another box:
As we plan for the year have we involved God into our plans and vision.
Some agencies may still be using analog video and think that’s getting the job done. But analog video has become pretty much obsolete and is considered an unavailable media. On top of that fact, evidence storage and retrieval gives its users headaches and the media quality degrades over time.
Or maybe he was concerned he’s slip in the sweat patch I’d left and miss a note.
The LaTour does not present us with the possibility
With one touch I canâ€™t let go
–from my pastor John’s sermon
For the last few days,I held the Bourke Street Bakery cookbook close to me like a bible. I would be poring over it in the kitchen,on the couch before the TV and finally before I turn in for the night in bed.... There are many good things in the book that get you excited.
There are many considerations when deciding to keep a handgun, or any gun for that matter, ready for use in a defensive situation or keeping that same gun away from those who have no business touching it. If you live alone or in a situation where responsible adults are the only folks around, you may choose to keep a loaded handgun ready for use without locking it up, possibly even in a holster on you.
The first two are pretty self-explanatory, yes? As for New Year's Resolutions, I've always figured if there's something you want to do, just do it. Be here now, right?
Drunk as Fuck
This leaves Afrikaners with an impossible choice: stay in South Africa and anglicize, or emigrate to Australia, and anglicize. In neither country is there an Afrikaner future. This is not even a fair choice. In Australia there is little crime and no affirmative action imposed on Afrikaners. Afrikaners emigrated in the 1830's from the Cape Colony during the Great Trek to escape British domination. Perhaps the current large-scale migration is the Last Trek which will close the book on centuries of Afrikaners, and in a thousand years all of Afrikaner experience will have been reduced to a footnote.
When you feel like there is a hurdle in your way, jump over it! Knock down those walls.
Finally, a word of congratulations to conservative talk show host Michael Gallagher. Mike Gallagher has probably the smallest of all radio empires among the Salem Broadcasting crowd, so much so that he’s on the air here locally between midnight and 4 a.m. I don’t even listen to him very often when I can’t sleep. But he did something awesome last week, and he wrote a column about it dated June 8, which appears on the townhall.com web site. What he did, or actually didn’t do, is that he refused to interview a British author named Christopher Hitchens. Hitchens has written a bestselling book called “God is not Great”. Mike Gallagher has correctly figured out that it is Christopher Hitchens who is not great.
Not to mention the cute tin. I have a weakness for Holiday tins. I pull the respective tins out for each holiday, and fill them with sweet goodness.
In 1926, Graham F. Blandy gave a portion of his estate, the Tuleyries, to the University of Virginia to educate "boys farming in the various branches". The 2 story century old brick slave quarters was enlarged and converted into an arboretum. Containing a diverse collection of trees and wooden shrubs, the Blandy Experimental Farm was designated the Virginia State Arboretum in 1986. Photos 2012.
A mere photo cannot do justice to those two display windows on the side of the Tiffany store. Next time you’re walking by, take a look. Even in a challenging economy, walking through the Galleria just makes you smile. One suspects that happy customers are more likely to indulge their shopping instincts in this kind of beautiful environment.
are filled with new trees, tiny bells, soft sleeping and love. love. love.
I twirl.
Our nation’s focus is now on punishment, not rehabilitation. Although violent crimes have not increased, the United States has the highest incarceration rate in the world, with more than 7.43 per 1,000 adults imprisoned at the end of 2010. Our country is almost alone in our fascination with the death penalty. 90 % of all executions are carried out in China, Iran, Saudi Arabia and the United States.
We started out with the blank wall, and taped off the edges:
Yeah I was totally an accomplice ... actually I think it was my idea ...
Note (from the LDFP website): “The Liberal Democrat Friends of Palestine exist to fight for the rights of the Palestinian People through the medium of the Liberal Democrat Party. We currently support the “two state solution” for an independent and viable Palestinian state, and security for both parties. We therefore call on Israel to renounce all claims to occupied land and to halt all illegal settlement building. If Israel is unwilling to do this, there will come a point at which “the one state solution”, under which Israel will need to offer all Palestinians citizenship in a single, secular State, will become the only way forward. This may be very soon.”
Copygrounds describes itself as “an academic discussion forum and digital media platform which focuses on the technological changes now taking place within contemporary media systems. The dynamics of technological development have been accompanied by numerous antagonisms and outright conflicts between parties with conflicting interests. These antagonisms and conflicts are the particular target of our analysis.”
When it comes to the story and the book, we really put our best into writing it, so there is probably not anything we would change in that regard. The one thing we would have changed is we would have found the time to write it four years ago when we had the idea before angels were even popular.
A new page made for another heritage book in the making…a picture book of my childhood. Something my children will appreciate someday…and that will be fun for me to do now!
i don't know if i'm capable of doing that. but i need to try. for D's sake and for my little boy's sake, if not for my own.
Rambling Recruiter
So here we are, creatures naturally concerned about our fellow humans, but also fairly selfish too. That puts us into quite a conundrum now doesn't it. Because how on earth do I assist those who I see are hurting and I feel for them and hang on to what I have at the same time?
2 stalks of celery, diced
“They do not have the standing either to rewrite or reinterpret the clear teaching of the Bible, which the Church has always understood to prohibit any and all sexual relations outside the union for life of one man and one woman,” said Canon Dr Chris Sugden, executive secretary of Anglican Mainstream.
someone patient
BROWNS - carbon
Is most successful when the sense of the inevitable
It was just idiots like us who misunderstood what they were saying when they said things like this.
I was beginning to think that he was going to eat the cat (not calling him Gore Vidal anymore) so hungry was he. His stomach rumbled all last night, something sounding like the pained moans of a wounded creature echoing through the deep, dark cave it'd crawled away to die in.
Here is my favorite campaign:
You see, I am very lazy. So all of this new found motivation and momentum has really got me going against my natural procrastinate-y sensibilities. Posting a daily blog isn't that complicated, so you may be thinking, what's the big deal? And it's not a big deal. I guess you can say that doing one more thing this past week aka writing a blog post that has effort, humor, thought, wit, etc put into it (you see, even though I am a lazy sod, I am a sight perfectionist and I want this blog to be quality, not just quantity. Not just empty, lazy, weak posts just for the sake of posting) was basically the straw that broke this mommy's back.
WOW! I wrote all of the stuff above on Dec 16th but couldn't finish it. Instead of moving forward with what would now be one whole month worth of info, I'll just post some of my Facebook status updates. The network here is more like dial-up without the up. In the city, the speed is 100-150 kb/s and here in the village, I'm good to get 12. Yes, I said twelve. So it was just easier to throw a status update on Facebook but my New Year's Resolution, whatever THAT means, is to blog more. So I'm here. I'll do one blog post per week that I've been here so they're not crazy long.
11. Prelude to Grans Volants
On Friday, we baked cookies and then it was time for ballet and swimming. Ballet was in a new hall with glass doors so we were able to watch the girls doing their class. Miss C seems to be getting on well although she does like to watch the older girls at the bits she isn't sure of or just doesn't want to join in with. I think they need to get a curtain for the doors as it must be distracting for the girls knowing their parents are able to see them.
I always apologize when I know I hurt someone. Because I never do it on purpose, especially not to those people I love dearly. I do hope that they know. I hope they understand that I didn't mean to, that I'm very truly sorry for hurting them. I do hope they know, that I spend much time thinking about it, wishing I could somehow make it go away. I do hope they know that my friendship is not less meaningful, that I love them and care for them.
so this one served us well with the cold temperatures
Perhaps because I've been trying to be open to more romance, I'm trying to encourage it in others as well. It's also shown itself in my life again as well, which has brought up a couple of questions.
I am proud of you.
Roast for 25 minutes, stirring halfway through, until just starting to brown.
action / superhero = new favorite movie genre. For real. The romantic/comedy/drama is so overrated. It’s action I like to see, especially in the theaters!
Okay, what you just read is a sample from my mind. It’s all jumped, there’s no real narrative and it’s just a concoction of emotions and feeling and experiences. It’s not that entertaining, nor is it that interesting (to most people, anyway). It goes completely against the tagline of my blog, I know. But that’s it, raw Winchesterz right above this paragraph. I don’t know how I’d feel if she actually stumbled upon this blog of mine and read everything. Relief? Nah. Excitement? Maybe a little. Anxiety? Most probably. Curiosity? Absolutely. My real question would be, though: is what I’ve written over the past months enough to coax her to say “hello” to me?
And not without reason. Some of the Muslim jokes were so close to stirring racial hatred that there could be a nice philosophical discussion on where the line lies. Though, interestingly, some of the jokes were so unsettling because they said out loud some normally unsayable truths.
After stamping with white ink and white powder heat embossing, punch a circle using your circle punch as I did here or use your circle die or any other cutting device.
So long until other REAL Mini System Tests! See you!
What is your favorite religious craft you make for the Last Supper?
SSSOOOooooooo... I was in Kinokinuya in Paragon shopping centre in BKK today (oh fuck, yesterday) in search of a remaindered copy (because I was not aware of a full price copy in Singapore, and he had mentioned it the other day on his blog, and here I am in Bangkok...) of Tim from Cultural Snow's book on the so-called Noughties - so-called because they ARE so called - and of course, having found one eventually: they hid that lost copy pretty damn well, right there under my nose, I continued on browsing.
Another distinctive feature of these stories is that they don’t always have clear-cut resolutions. Flaxman Low believes he has solved the puzzle but sometimes he’s not entirely sure. And the reader is not entirely sure either. It’s an interesting rather modern touch. Not everything can be explained with certainty.
“This is Middle Sprout and this is Little Sprout,” I helped to remind him. “How are you feeling dad?”
1- 2005 Samichlaus
My passion therefore is to bring about more "hybrids" to help companies to maximize the values of their data and win! This is the reason for Analytics123.com and its mission to inform, educate and promote the importance of such "hybrid" talents!
If this trend doesn't scare you then GO BOLD. If you own it everyone will love it! Leopard Print Dress, Macys, $65.40
I did enjoy the characters though. Eryn was someone who never could stand being left behind, always took action and had a sharp tongue. Alec's crew consisting of himself, his brother Matt and Brit were also a well-rounded cast. In books the family are usually flat or non-existing but there was a great deal of spotlight on Eryn's Uncle Marcus and Aunt Sammi as well as her cousin Paige. Paige was pretty fun to read about although her character did come off as a stereotypical queen bee, but I'm glad there wasn't a lot of high school drama. Wade, the police chief's son, was my favourite out of the cast as he had the most depth.
He has applied for a liquor license, and soon they will be serving beer and wine. It's a lovely place to come and eat and chat.
she giggled and gasped,
No go away while I console George, or I will have to make the obvious comparisons to a man’s skinny refrigerator being reflective of other parts’ inadequacies.
Great for a beginner or just to try something a little different.
Makes: 4 servings
Just for a bit of fun, I have plotted the section of the Main North railway that I am modelling between Chilcotts Ck bridge and Pangela in Google Earth. I have also marked the locations of the three crossing loops (signal boxes). The prototype length is 7.1 miles (11.3km).
Mondegreens
Her first two fabric lines for Robert Kaufman are just the tip of the brilliant iceberg which is Suzy's portfolio. She is certainly one to keep an eye on, and I personally can't wait to see what her next fabric line brings!
Intestinal polyps supposedly can turn into colon cancer. I have no idea how this happens or why. If it actually were a mutated deep-sea fish that barfed up corrosive acid you could appease it with blood sacrifices, but its not, which is why they have to inflate your butt and stick a camera up it. Life is a mystery. In any event they took this electrified cautery thing and lassoed the polyps and sent a charge through and the polyps went 'PFFFT'. I can't say I was displeased at all. When you consider the fact that this completely obviates the need at some future date to remove several yards of colon, sew the anus shut and cut a hole in your side so you can shit in a bag, you got to figure you don't have a whole lot left to bitch about anyway. The disgusting practical joke potential is of course astronomical, but I'll shit in that bag when I come to it.
Several years ago, having witnessed more and more of the hill being excavated, I enquired as to what on earth was going on with such a beautiful unspoiled area of countryside and was told by the planning department that they were quite happy with the goings-on and that Mr Wood had planning permission for a farm track and a sheep-handling shed. The land was so special and indeed worthy of SSSI listing before the desecration was carried out.
I got a call from camp yesterday morning...Bryn was in the nurse's lodge with a temp of 101 degrees and had been there since about 10:00 the night before feeling bad. As I was on the phone with the nurse discussing whether or not I should go get her, Bryn passed out and hit a railing and got a bloody nose. Needless to say, mama was in the car within 30 minutes making the 4 hour trip back to Rolla, MO to get Bryn. When I got there and went into the room she started sobbing and was just a little inferno. She was crying because she felt bad, didn't want to leave camp and wanted to go home all at the same time. Poor kid.
Did someone say ball? Let me out, I want to play!
I come to a crossroads and consider turning left to the church at Boldre that my guide at St Nicholas had recommended I visit. But actually, I’m quite enjoying sitting on a bench on the grassy patch at the centre of the crossroads, sun and blue sky overhead, birdsong and the faint smell of wood smoke in the air. The black and white cast-iron road sign by my side, its fingers pointing east, west, north and south, gives this rural scene a nostalgic inter-War feel.
She is only a week and a half old at the moment, so she’s obviously not living with me yet, but she is so super gorgeous and I cannot wait until she is old enough to be miiiiiine.
Types of Healthy Fats
I dive into midnight
I also know this whole indictment is a disinfo job…his book was a CIA project….and, haha, he does mention me in his book, but not by name.
Time is just drifting away in this tropical ambiance, and we seem to be floating through the year without even noticing it. My husband still reads German newspapers while I try to be good and at least read the Seattle Times, but honestly, it doesn’t matter much anymore. Life is so different here! When people in Germany complain about healthcare or education, I find it amusing because in comparison to Mexico, Europe and the US are paradise! I cannot relate to people’s problems anymore, it seems, and at the same time, they cannot relate to ours.
commentary tracks, on the first and last episodes, featuring Davies and Julie Gardner. They’re a reliably fun and informative couple of hours, which cover a great deal of ground and are well worth a listen. Only problem is, they were recorded after only the third episode had aired, so neither of them have any idea that the general public isn’t going to be eating this material up, although Davies confesses that he’s unsure if it’s going to be everyone’s cup of tea. Next up is the bonus web series entitled “Web of Lies,” which is similar in style to one of those animated motion comics. I don’t know exactly how this was presented on the internet, but here all the bits and pieces are edited together into one 30-minute piece. It tells two alternating tales – one in the past with Jack and Gwen, and another set concurrent with Miracle
Now exactly how does this opening tie into a football blog? Well, I’ll tell you. The effect of de-humanising the opposition is creeping into the game. There have always been the most one-eyed and myopic football fans who have always done this, but it seems that fans of all colours, whether they be Red, White or various shades of Blue, are starting to slip into tribal warfare. Sick songs rain down from the stands on all sides some so bad that I wouldn’t even dream of putting them into writing. Hatred is aimed at players, merely because they wear the wrong colour shirt.
Sat-AM: 1:13, 2500' ~ Green Mt.
Mom’s have to take charge since the family relies on them to provide the meals. The 50′s brought us into the tv dinner and quick-prepared food age, processed food came on the scene and the whole foods were for the hippies. Processed foods are inexpensive and economically challenged families are more likely to buy these products.
Geophagy -
Back facts: "Singled" is not capitalized. Just want to make that clear one more time for all the grade school kids out there.
Woodward and Bernstein paint Deep Throat, writes Holland, as a “selfless high-ranking official intent on exposing the lawlessness of the Nixon White House.” But this is self-serving nonsense.
Long snowy winters in Scotland have been rare enough, in recent years, for me to have relished almost every minute of the past two winters of heavy snowfall and extreme cold. But even I am ready to say goodbye to the snow, and to welcome the snowdrops. Along with all the other sighns of spring.
While judging from the weekend crowds, this place is definitely popular, I don't hear much about it from the LA food crowd, but I should. If you like meats and sweets, you need to go.
Ink: black memento
Total Running Time: 187 minutes
"Now that my family and I only eat good food and bla bla bla........we are never sick."
I also have a 24-70 mm lens, which is great for everything. I have an inexpensive tripod but never use it because it's so stiff and won't move with me. Which is one reason my photos aren't sharp as they should be.
Spices:
With a bit more late-hopping we could have zingy marvel on our hands. As-is, I'm quite glad not to be out of pocket.
While working as a Digital Marketing Manager for Colombia, Venezuela and Caricam, I also had experience on the Development of Digital Marketing campaigns and bought media expenditure processess and gained skills on how to contribute to solutions for specific market needs depending on its situation and objectives. During these five years of working on the Digital Marketing Area in Nokia LTA, gained the experience and the skills that make me the professional I am today.
So, for the next baby shower, I asked my other mommy friend if she wanted letters, too. She and her hubby came to the decision that they would wait until their daughter was a little older so that she could decide what theme she wanted. I thought that was so sweet, so I gave her an IOU, and I can’t wait to see what little Lila wants her letters to look like.
The T2118 from TC-2000 rolled over in early February although the moving average didn’t officially roll over until early-March. Still no signs of a bottom yet.
Hopefully I have some good news to report about Magnum. I’m really surprised by how much he’s been on my mind lately and I seriously can’t wait to see him. I’m also really nervous that this is going to end in disappointment again because really, I don’t feel like dealing with that again.
b) comparing to the descenting rate of my(f.i.) income,I would be living under the same standards as I do now with the same inflation etc,in case we exited the euro.
I think he has fewer readers than he should because while I have recognized his genius, the rest of the world has less experience with recognizing genius (it's easy when all you have to do is look in the mirror), and therefore it does not know it should be fawning all over him and trying to get his autograph and into his pants.
So essentially to keep the chair clean you either need several cushions or to use it without one at all. Enter my new TT cushion, sporting some new and very cute $3.99/meter Ikea fabric, with foam the whole thing cost less than $9 and took an afternoon; good deal compared to $90 for a Stokke one. ;)
Post-divorce, and in the absence of having enough money for a boob job, I did the dental-bleaching thing. And holy shit, was that not a good experience. Funny thing is, there were red flags I ignored pre-treatment. Namely:
I like to be supportive of my kids. I like to encourage them to be creative. I like to teach them to be open-minded.
This morning Erin came in to show me what the tooth looked like dangling. Yuck! I hate wiggle teeth! She left the room & came back seconds later. The tooth was in a napkin. Now the kid is really toothless!
“Junsu-ah, you ate?”He ask when he comeback home after suck somebody death maybe.
Two days later, Tasca was summoned by her captain, who informed her that she was being suspended pending a disciplinary hearing. She learned that in addition to “using force” to stop Rella’s assault on Kyle Sharp, Tasca was accused of failing to assist Bogota Officer Jerome Fowler when
"Think boldly. Eliminate one bridge (on Ogilvie, north of Governor's) and open Spencer Creek to view. It would make the intersection more beautiful, not to mention safer."
Red is the most valuable form of Coral. Coral has a Moh’s hardness of between 3-4. Coral is the the skeletal remain of tropical ocean animals called Phylum Cnidaria of the Anthozoa Class.When they are young ( Coral Polyps) they are tiny yet as they mature they coexist in colonies and become a part of coral reefs and atolls.
If we try to cast an instance of the class above we will obtain the following error:
Mason J ultimately held that the Commonwealth legislation in that case did not go “too far” in restricting user even though, as he noted, the practical effect of the impugned provisions was “to prevent any development of the property in question, subject to the Minister’s consent, so as to preserve its character as a wilderness area”. Nevertheless, the owner’s proprietary rights could still be enjoyed to a significant extent, not only through excluding others from possession but by actively enjoying rights of occupation for recreational, scientific and environmental purposes. The Commonwealth legislation even permitted improvements to be contructed as long as they did not threaten the land’s world heritage environmental values as a dam manifestly would have.
one way or the other
#10 Alison
That said, a few things I'm wondering, having followed your blog for years.
Step 7.
These countries are trying to provide goods and services more equitably in order to reduce inequality. In your opinion, is this method effective?
AND -- best of all -- my daughter doesn't look like a mini pole-dancer or a walking advertisement for Barbie.
I walked around the gardens and saw a group of young people. Unfortunately they were sitting too close to a fountain so the voice in the audio would have been too weak. I walked further into the gardens and in the distance I saw an older man sitting on a bench. I started walking towards him but as I got within 50 metres he packed up his belongings and off he went. I decided to walk that way anyway in case there were other people around the corner. As I got closer to him I realised he had an M on his jumper. Oh yes, that’s right, he worked for Metro! This, I decided, was the end of day two interviews.
The long and the short of it, however, is that The Writing Has Suffered. Yes, I’m also wondering why on earth I’m writing with capital letters. I suspect it may be an after effect of the Stress (or Insufficient Chocolate and Vanilla this morning).
The Barbarians Strike the Empire.
A last note - Thursday is the random drawing for the $50 gift certificate to Novica.com. Leaving a comment here before 2/23 gets your name in the hat. It is also possible to get a 2nd entry. Check out this post for details.
"Because He made you that way, and He knows it is best for your toenails to keep growing and for us to keep clipping them."
Get ready for adventures within adventures, as the First Doctor and his companions brave screaming jungles, snows of terror and seas of acid! Discover a wealth of fascinating new info as THE FACT OF FICTION scrutinises the 1964 story, THE KEYS OF MARINUS!
Drawn from a universe of 302 business drivers focused on customers, employees and productivity – the Return on Disability® Rating measures 19 publicly observable data points. The data points are subsequently weighted to reflect the relative importance in value creation for each company.
"Sometimes they bite or clap people on their faces if they try to defend their property and they can snatch ladies' handbags and even destroy cars as they search for food."
As beautiful as those bookstores are, according to the UK's Guardian newspaper, they come in second and third on a list of the world's most beautiful bookstores. And number one? It's this incredible place in Maastricht, Netherlands.
I’m No Theologian
Black Rat can't quit laughing. It's perfect..she laughs between breaths.
Jane Tennison has been trying to prove herself as a detective for years, but she has been continually passed over because she is a woman in a man’s world. She finally gets her chance when tragedy strikes the department and her superiors have no choice but to turn to her to head up a murder investigation. The men she needs to help her do not appreciate having to answer to a woman and they have no intentions of cooperating with her. Jane becomes obsessed with the case and her personal life begins to suffer. She is completely wrapped up in her career and this is finally her chance to prove herself. She’s not going to let anyone stand in her way.
and smile upon us
The purpose of renunciation is to dedicate the soul into the all-soul, as explained previously in describing how Yudhiṣṭhira prepared himself for renunciation. The result of such dedication is that the soul is always rapt in loving embrace with the all-soul. Thus Sūta describes Yudhiṣṭhira as being rapt in such embrace in the core of his being, and here describes the contemplations of his brothers as constantly rapt in an embrace with vaikuṇṭha-caraṇāmbuja, the lotus-like feet of The Tranquil.
So, good news and bad news on the guild front.
While this year will pass far too quickly for my liking, I can’t wait to see where Nick’s journey takes him. I only hope it’s not all that far from home. We only have two children (though Wrigley does make three. Thankfully he doesn’t have aspirations beyond home schooling) and can’t afford to loose one. More golf team, more Varsity hockey, more homework, more friends, more decisions and more moments to savor…..
She watches him slip off his wedding ring and thinks to herself
I love my band and how they make my music come alive.
We have had a few changes and tweaks in the past few weeks, and are delighted to introduce Joyce and Stacie to the Stamp N doodle Community.
Some people thought enough is enough and created a sort of public commitment declaration to boycott Elsevier including not publishing, peer-reviewing or joining Editorial Boards of Journals own by Elsevier. In principle it seems like a good idea. Let alone the moral stand: Our university is facing cuts in research budget (for seminars, travelling, even teaching) every year for the last three. Giving money to a company whose only effort is some secretary work, printing books and running a website making over 20% of benefit a year seems wrong. Especially if we take in account that there are lots of academics behind, funded by public bodies and usually Governments, doing most of the work for free. What’s more, paying for it, since these universities and research centres are the ones which pay for the journals.
Despite being one of the biggest and most well-known entertainment sites in America, TMZ only gained 11% of the vote. However, this could be due to its focus on American news, which may not be as appealing to people in the UK.
God sends His son to Earth; on one of the mountains of which I shall tell you.
Still we shared many a laugh
I’ve reached out to my circle of mommies and daddies for help. “Bite him back!” (Uh, no.) “Give him an ice-pop.” (Done, couch now covered in red splotches.) “Spank him!” (Considered, especially after this morning’s incident, but declined.) “Babies need to be trained – you know, like dogs are trained. When he bites tell him no and show him what he can chew on.” (?!!?!! Somewhat controversial, and yet disappointed I did not think of this myself!)
Given under my hand, at the city of New York, the 3rd day of October, A.D. 1789.
First, I would like to apologize to Red because this actually arrived over a week ago, but I was in the middle of finals and didn't get around to posting about it.
As far as I can tell, I get to say that I won for the best parenting blog in the Blogger's Choice Awards. ;)
Walk, metro, walk, walk and walk a bit more, and there i was, seeing THE Steven Wilson and his amazing band performing a brilliant show a couple of metres from me and a not so crowded venue.
More here at the BBC link:
Her husband Colby was my boyfriend for over three years. He is also the boyfriend you've heard me refer to as the "fire and gasoline" relationship. Most people wouldn't bother keeping touch with a friend with whom the situation is so awkward.
I went to the bedroom where I had hid my copy.
And if you’re a progressive that cares about investments in Head Start and student loan programs and medical research and infrastructure, we’re not going to be able to make progress on those areas if we haven’t gotten our fiscal house in order.
I was about 15 years old and singing the song “Put your hand in the hand” from Ocean in the back seat of our family car. That song has a lot of key changes and I was making every one of them perfectly, if I do say so my self. I used to do all of the parts of a song when I would sing along with it (still do actually). My brother, Dick was in the front seat of the car and turned around and said “hey, that’s pretty good”. For him, to divvy out a compliment like this to ME was extraordinary. Compliments were not handed out to me….EVER. My mother looked at him and said “Don’t encourage her!”. I kept singing anyway.
49. Throughout its hundred year legacy, Universal brought to audiences the first films of talents such as John Ford, Clint Eastwood, Steven Spielberg, Norman Jewison, Ben Stiller, Robert Zemeckis, John Hughes, Amy Heckerling, Spike Jonze, Zack Snyder and Judd Apatow.
You can listen to the program tonight or later from the archive but do listen to it.
Just checking in to let you know we’re doing okay. I know many of you have been worried, and I want to alleviate you through these posts. While the news was unbearable and debilitating, we HAVE had a good day yesterday, and today looks like it might be the same. William and I were both out of bed without too many tears, helping the kids get ready for school. We’ve already figured out that we just have to take these next few months minute by minute and not worry about what tomorrow will bring. We have decided to continue the pregnancy, although we have been given the option to induce preterm labor. We believe that for what ever reason, this baby was meant to be here on this earth, even if only briefly. GOD HAS A PLAN IN THIS. It’s not for us to figure out or to alter in any way.
* 2 1/4 sticks unsalted butter
Do me a favor: If you are checking the blog, and the number 10,000 comes up when you are on here, leave a comment, ok? Tell me where you are reading from and who you are (you can send an email if you prefer to be private) and I will celebrate you and your being number 10,000 somehow....ok?
But this summer I saw one for real, in the woods at Somerford Common. It was hovering near a mound of straw, a nest of some kind with a small tunnel entrance. And it was huge - the hornet that is - this wasn't a large wasp, it was a golden, iridescent, gob-smacking monster. It's enormous, I kept saying aloud; absolutely bloody huge.
Steven
As we all know it is an act of heinous racism for victims of violence to make reference to the ethnicity of their attacker, and it appears that this sanction is also applied to other protected groups, as members of the gay community discovered when they complained about gangs of black gay bashers attacking clubers leaving venues in the Vauxhall area.
I feel like a heroin addict or something. I’m so jittery and I haven’t had caffeine and I need tea but I don’t have enough money to buy sweetener. I’ve only got enough soya milk to last the week and I can’t drink tea if it isn’t sweet and even if sugar had no calories I hate the taste of it in tea because it’s so sickly and disgusting.
Midwest USA — currently under VERY severe weather.. heading ENE towards the upper midwest, northern states…
I would say that if you are pursuing a career in writing, this standard applies. But if writing is a vocation -- a calling you cannot ignore, or turn from, or forget, ever -- if writing is your vocation, it will never matter what age you begin, what you were pursuing, or how long it takes you to get to your goal. It's down to you. Other people aren't going to be riding shotgun with you in the long and lonely nights when you question why you're putting pen to paper in the first place, they aren't going to be riding it out with you when the rejection slips come pouring in, and they aren't going to be there when someone is brutally taken from you and all you've got is a gallon of ink and a ream of paper to think it over with.
to the safety of my musing -
“Supporting any form of blockade would be a violation of the Malvinas inhabitants’ human rights and the same we say with Cuba, we repeat in this case” said Almagro.
Finally i realize my defeat and start laying there and realizing "O crap this hurts"
I love this pic with Gary and Lola. We have the same pose with Gary and Wynn. She is getting rolls all over her and is starting to smile at people a little.
So she sells herself
17. Orange Juice - Three Cheers For Our Side
Culture and the Hunt by Ted Kerasote, 1993, p. 266).
Herbert lives on, for now.
They are part by part, which are meant to tell a story.
UK Shakespearean company Propeller is an odd beast. Under the artistic direction of Edward Hall, its mission is to refresh Shakespeare using physical theatre. With this goes an attempt to recreate the rough-house theatre of Elizabethan times: without claiming that Propeller is a theatrical version of those early music groups that play baroque scores using authentic instruments of the time, the company calls on some familiar tropes of the Elizabethan theatre, reworking them for a contemporary audience.
Today's post is to welcome other colors and boost up any dish with health benefits. My newest favorite addition to our dishes is the pepper. I have been buying a bag of what they call small sweet peppers. The colors are just great. My decorating genes are delighted to add more color to our meals. Of course, spring will bring us even more color for our consumption...berries, watermelon, peaches...oh my!
It amazed me most that all of those last 5 started with "R"... And with how quickly they came to my mind, I knew I was not making them up myself...
is well-firmed up. About 6 to 8 hours later, I do the shell detail.
“Simply put, running a business is a lot like driving a car! And running a business without the proper tools and insight is like driving a car without a destination and without a route to follow. Your business deserves the same kind of attention to business insight.” See full article here.
Look for me in the audience on Late Night with Jimmy Fallon tonight at 12:30!
The community dental team provide NHS dental care for patients who have special needs, mobility issues, are medically compromised and/or housebound.
Welcome to the official blog of Team 'Herding Cats' - the two-man Mongol Rally team that will set new records for incompetence, ham-fistedness and cluelessness.
Start now you will need ages.
The Pituitary and Pineal glands are the highest glands located inside our bodies. They are related to the Light that can develop only though silence. The Pineal gland is the initial point in the construction of the embryo inside of the mother’s womb. The Thyroid is activated when one decides to take action. These three glands are majorly developed during the period of adulthood. Until such a time, the gifts related to each of these centers can only be felt lightly. Adulthood can bring skilled abilities to life, such as correct and pondered speech, clear vision, right judgment, analytic skills and also wisdom. The last chakra to fully develop is always the Heart chakra.
There's a slideshow on the new Atlantic Yards web site (dubbed AtlanticYards.con by Lumi Rolley of NoLandGrab.org) that purports to show the current conditions of buildings in the project footprint. While some conditions are current, others are decidedly stale, thus obscuring renovations or new signage.
That began to change in 1995, when the World Wildlife Fund and other environmental activists successfully lobbied the Tanzanian government to protect the southern half of the island and the surrounding waters as the Mafia Island Marine Park. The 510-square-mile preserve is home to 400 species of fish and 48 types of corals, as well as giant green sea turtles and at least a few nearly extinct manatee-like dugong.
Despite my dad always telling me it was 'fixed', I just couldn't comprehend it at the time. The thought that the two warring gents in their underpants in front of me, may have hours earlier shared a pie, a pint and the petrol money to get there was just too absurd to take in... The atmosphere was electric, and the crowd would really live each bout. The front row was always hogged by dangerous old grannies, armed with handbags and umbrellas with which to thump any unlucky 'baddies'. Of course you could smoke where you liked in those days, and the image of the heavy cigarette smoke rising towards the huge hot lights above the ring is still crystal clear in my mind.
The photo above is one I took of WRosie "big and prego!" and will post more once she delivers. Do any of you remember how you felt hours, days just before delivery!?
"To boldly go where no man has gone before," might have been Buckminster Fuller's motto, which is well demonstrated by the current show at the San Francisco Museum of Modern Art (SFMOMA). While not a retrospective, there is more than enough to overwhelm the first time visitor.
How could that not be fun? I think Stuart took me just to get me off his back, which I appreciate because I don't necessarily enjoy whining, not at this age. I do however enjoy sweeties and I know for a fact that he enjoys Jelly Bellies - specifically the Pomegranate ones - be careful not to get them mixed up with Cinnamon because I did that this morning and had to give myself CPR.
Split pea soup is probably my all time favorite. It is a blank canvas. Dress it up for dinner with curry, lime and cilantro or keep it humble by adding simple root veggies and few spices; regardless of your mood, the precious pea will be happy to please your palate. ( Unless you are my friend, Regina! hahah )
8. Sue Bird – Seattle Storm*
Dark Matter is gathering,
Barnes, a Sabah lawyer, was believed to be acting as a nominee for Musa Aman. The information on his key account relating to the Chief Minister, UBS A/C231117, forms part of a flow chart analysis, compiled by ICAC investigators, who were tracing the money flowing in and out of the Hong Kong bank accounts controlled by one of Musa’s other known side-kicks, Michael Chia (Chia Tien Foh).
Here's what it looked like on the 18th March when we took the ceiling down.
April 1st 9am-6pm
You can see that the first two shades are the most sparkly, and this is possibly the only range in Lavshuca where I’ve had to deal with minor fall-out. But the texture, application, pigmentation, lasting power are all great so I’m ready to overlook that small issue. I’ve purchased many Lavshuca eyeshadow palettes, but the Eye Color Select Range remains one of my favorites.
Latitude: 28.07°N (28°4’0″N)
Questions, comments? Changeinadvance@gmail.com
Hello all and welcome to todays blog hop for World Wide Marriage day hosted by Crafty and Green, Tina.
It's been a hectic day to start with and I really won't want to spend more than required time to do this post. I am really happy that I have these posts where I only need to talk and not think about how I made the dish. Most times I either note down things in draft. However trust me, I hardly understand that myself after a while. So I try my best to write as clearly as I can when I am noting down a recipe that I made. Since I can never recreate a recipe completely without any alteration, I know I might miss out the taste if I don't write it right away.
Friday night I moderated Hot Night, which is something we do at a chapter meeting at least once a year. We are a critique chapter and at every meeting, we are critiquing someone’s manuscript, usually the first 20 or so pages. Hot Night is different in that anyone who wants to read brings a love scene (sweet, sensual, or spicy) of about 5 pages to share. Then we offer critique. A chaptermate, Melonie Johnson, and I moderated the sensual Hot Night group and it was a ton of fun. The session was supposed to last an hour and we went for more than an hour and a half. We had a great time and quite a few people came up to us afterwards or even on Saturday to talk about how much they got out of the session even if they hadn’t read.
And poetry would be good. I think I was discouraged recently in my poetic endeavors. It’s the self-critical parts of us that really seem able to stymy creative outpourings. Unfortunately. One of the weirder things I’ve done since I was a kid is collect quotes that I love, type them or write them, and add them to a small folder where they are combined with funny or pretty cards people have given me, bizarre doodles from class, and other scraps of life like bumper stickers, etc. I take this folder with me and reassemble the items described on a bulletin board so that now most bits have multiple holes in them from the various thumb tacks I’ve stuck them with over the years. It’s nice because it reminds me that I like to be creative — that sometimes I’m good at it and that other people who are creative inspire me.
Peace has power to do something for the believer. It is guarding your heart and mind. Guarding is a military term. It is peace that has the power to take away anxiety. Think of that! Seeing us with peace would get people’s attention.
The ice cream base is made with milk, heavy cream, sugar, and peppermint extract. We also added a tiny bit of green food coloring, but you can add more if you'd like a brighter green color. The crushed oreos were added during the last 5 minutes of churning.
3. Love, a delightsome tickling. Indefinable etc.
OK - We are now officially Israeli citizens (as of last Thursday, in fact). We flew to Israel on a Nefesh B'Nefesh charter flight. Everyone on the flight was making aliya. Almost half the passengers were children! The flight was relatively smooth (much smoother than when I flew back to the states last month: alone with the 3 kids on Lot airlines with a 4 hour layover in Warsaw!). (See picture above of Ian, Yonah and Tamar - getting along grandly on the ElAl plane!)
It’s a self-perpetuating problem. Because media images are so pervasive and play such a huge role in how people learn how to define themselves and others, we tend to default in those definitions to what those images tell us. If the only examples of computer programmers a given girl sees are men, she’s going to assume that that profession is not for her, and self-select for something in which she does feel represented. Girls whose families make a point of telling them that they can have tech careers, or who are encouraged to be mavericks, and do something that a girl isn’t expected to do, may well buck that conditioning. But most are simply going to go with what their culture tells them about that profession and the people in it.
Phreak: Blinding dart’s cool-down too long…
no no
I must fold it.
Horner
3. How do you spend your me time (you do make sure you have me time, don’t you?)?
I paid my lawnboy to come plow it for me with his tractor. He charged me 10 dollars. What a bargain!
I assume, as with the previous witnesses, that it is Mr Bird’s position that he told the truth to the best of his knowledge and he would deny any accusation of perjury which might, in due course, be brought against him.
Quarter 2 Measure: Leauxra kept her social networking and blogging to slightly less than two-thirds of her work day. She plans to improve this metric for the remainder of the year so that she will remain employed, and has set a new goal of 90% of her time to be spent messing around on the interwebs during work hours.
We have to have a concept of home that is broad enough, that is supple enough, to include many.
So we moved the Broody Hen to the nursery coop, along with six chicks and a half-hatched egg…hopefully tomorrow there will be seven chicks.
What? Other friends? Did that mean he considered me a friend? We’d only known each other for a few weeks. I realised I needed to speak, and fast, if I wasn’t to make a terrible impression and get struck off that friends list.
We all are a work in progress. I did something recently that was a mistake and I had to ask for forgiveness. It is especially bad when you do it to someone who you really care about. As I said, we ALL are a work in progress.
But then there's the stuff of ugly fights, in person, on the phone. The kinds of things you take to a mediator because you just don't have the perspective to work through them in a constructive way. Because both parties involved are raw.
10 Grand Army Plaza 718-230-2100
Use the logic of the professional athlete, for it is sound. You have an increasingly unique and valuable skill... make your best deal. You only have a few years at it, ten on average (per our own college's statistics), so protect you and yours and get paid yo!
2. Anger provokes anger. I’ve had customers walk on the lot with so much anger and hostility that I just didn’t want to work with them. When they started speaking in a negative tone, I felt angry – I wanted to go on the defensive too.
Pick 8: Dolphins
After browning about a pound of venison with garlic powder, onion powder, oregano, chives, diced orange and green pepper, dried onion flakes, a bit of water (to de-glaze the pot/pan) I add ketchup, mustard and brown sugar to taste/consistency. Most recipes call for dried mustard but yellow mustard worked fine as I couldn’t locate mine in my messy spice cupboard. The meat does tend to set up a bit as it cooks. Be careful not to overcook if using venison and any ground meat (beef, turkey) will work fine just be sure to drain/rinse the meat if it is too greasy.
In truth, that partnership had been dead for some time, and for many on the inside of The Beatles’ retinue, McCartney’s announcement was hardly a surprise.
3. We shouldn’t be. We must fiight very hard to avoid it.
- Visit my NEW blog From India. With Love. and comment on ANY POST. Be sure to include: (Apt.412 giveaway some place in your comment) so I know you're entering the draw.
Undaunted by his physical handicap, he is an example that inspires others.
I know during one of my many sleepless nights (that are now being blamed on me) I considered taking up science fiction novels (specifically dystopias) for there long lasting side-effects that effect my dreams. Other than for that reason alone, sci-fi has never really gotten my attention.
“The President was hoping to learn more about the dispute between our country and China on the matters pertaining to Panatag Shoal. He hoped that by listening to the lyrics of Sergio Mendes’s 1968 single Scarborough Fair in person, that it would help clear up his head,” revealed Lacierda. “He was very disappointed when he found out that Mendes would not be singing that song. That is why he just scheduled a debriefing with the Department of National Defense (DND) and the Department of Foreign Affairs (DFA) today, hence his absence in this press conference.”
It isn’t easy to fill up a blank space
Under nighttime illumination shortly after midnight on April 3rd, Phil Garber, Product Advisor for The Rigging Box, Inc., of Lorton, was one of a few of those working through the night dedicated to the safe and successful lift of the first and largest of three bridge sections measuring 170 feet at a weight of 140,000 pounds.
Welcome to Ladakh- a haven for adventure junkies. Often presented as remote and isolated, Ladakh is a unique blend of Tibetan and indigenous traditions of Kashmir and Central Asia.
7) Headliners
RND 3-5: sc in each st around (18 stitches)
All that said: holy shit is this a good book. This may in fact be the best policy book I’ve read in I can’t think how long—certainly the last policy-ish book I read this good was Herding Donkeys, though that wasn’t policy in this way. Anyway: Drift‘s subtitle is The Unmooring of American Military Power and I felt a level of oh-my-gosh-yes-exactly while reading it that I haven’t felt from any recent nonfiction. The ultimate gist of Maddow’s argument is that the way the United States wages war has increasingly become a private, unilateral decision, an executive command adjudicated behind the doors of some secure room in the White House’s basement—a decision which, sure, is come to with the help of military and intelligence experts, but ultimately the decision’s in one man’s hands.
Christmas is coming up, but as some of you know, I celebrate Yule...which the traditions are similar to Christmas traditions...but most traditions were part of Yule first. Yes, we give gifts, put up a tree, decorate with lights, etc. We send out cards too and that is a Victorian era tradition for Christmas. I like sending cards out because its always fun to receive something in the mail. Too bad stamps are getting off the charts expensive, but we make room for that cost and send out our cards.
Both sides are true, the couple does not know the counseling that the mother received, they do not know the pressure the mother felt, they were just excited to finally become a forever family. Maybe they overlooked the coercive nature of adoption, maybe they had not truly looked into the history of adoption, maybe they have not come to a resolution about their own fertility. Adopting a child does not make you fertile. It gives you a chance to raise a child only.
Let me know if you have any more questions.
Their meals appeared and Lieutenant Frio ate in silence waiting for Dylan. He plopped down in the booth clutching the white drugstore bag. He noticed Frio glance at the pharmacy receipt with Ritalin in bold letters across the top. He took a bite of his cheeseburger and gobbled his food as though he hadn’t eaten in a long time.
Yesterday, we mostly hung out at home, letting KayTar get the rest she needs. She and Dobby are both on the same cough medicine (Triaminic), so I keep joking that she's got kennel cough, too. In the evening our friends came over to hang out and we played Mexican Train and had mudslides.
I will still be creating handmade items to sale on my online store to raise money for infertility treatments. This will not change. The money in that fund will go to nothing else but the treatments I am receiving for infertility. I am sure I am going to love it at this new job and I hope everything works out for the best. God has a plan for us and I am not giving up. Hope will prevail!
soul-eater Zapiro. Focus on Zapiro while you eat: you'll be nibbling
This is the first political event I’ve been to in year. And while I am not a fan of large gatherings of people (I’m a solitary soul and it works for me) I had a wonderful time.
Me: ‘How are things? Having a lovely time?’
Jeff P: is Urkel a superhero?
22 pipers piping,
I used to track by day and sometimes I'd leave some on the table. If I went to the gym and earned 7 APs I might eat 5 of those and leave 2, for example. The next day those 2 would be gone. But after this past weekend I was in the red (and still am) on my points for the week. So I decided to change to tracking them weekly so I can catch-up on my points and get back in the black before Friday. At first this idea seemed like cheating but then I went on the WW message boards and asked what others do (and if they change back and forth from daily to weekly). Here are the responses I got (btw, the numbers under the screen names are the writer's starting weight/current weight/goal weight - as you can see, some are under their original goal weight):
Sift flours together with baking powder, salt and spices.
Buuut I basically don't know anything about that sorta thing, so it'll take a while to do some research into it. I have dreamweaver and kiiinda know how to use it, but other than that, I'm clueless haha.
At first he thought maybe it was just the remnants of a dream, but the sound of muffled voices and muted whispers outside the truck brought him fully awake and set his heart racing. Silently, he readied the shotgun and eased to a half-sitting position. There he waited, trying to hold his breath. He distinctly heard a human voice beyond the driver’s door of the truck.
The girls and I were having withdraws from tomato sauce and so on the night that
The dentist went to chat with the person on the phone. Saylor said he wanted to leave, go home. He didn't care if he had to live with his tooth just the way it was.... "I just want to go home," he urged, tears flowing.
tommorrow is our wedding anniversary, 14 years ago since I tiptoed in my Doc Martins and Tiara down the aisle to marry my best friend...our wedding favors were homemade cookies iced with our initials and we danced to our friends band and mix tapes into the early hours.....we are going off into the woods for a picnic to celebrate and make the most of the lovely sun :) :) :)
She watches the little girl wander up and down the stairs, around and around the parked car, braids bouncing as she attempts to shake off her adult follower. I wonder for a moment what kind of idiot would bring a small child here, of all places. Then it crosses my mind that maybe it’s a staged performance, a different, quieter, and even cruel for many, sort of protest. I think perhaps it would be a more effective endeavor than waving signs, in general. But not against someone like me.
For I have gone mad.
Shit! I'm embarrassed! I don't really know what to say....tell the truth mate....do it!
So this is where you guys come in – If you have any suggestions as to how I can carry out a random act of kindness in the most effective/ least awkward way possible, leave them in the comments section. I will take you up on them, and then do a follow-up post with the results of my attempts. ……Which inevitably will fail cause I’m a weirdo and will probably make it weird… but it’s worth a shot, anyway:
And so it is, I think, with Elizabeth A. Svigar's
On days like this, it is time to think about one's last meal. And if I am goin' out, you better bet your sweatpanted ass, I am goin' out with carbs.
Rx: Forgoing life’s 3 staples: Coffee, chocolate, spicy food. My lungs are imbalanced–too hot. Counterintuitively, I must drink hot water. And 2 or 3 times a day, take my Chinese meds: A ping pong ball that pops open, Pokemon-like, to reveal a gooey bitter black ball of Yangyin Qingfei Wan. Then I drink 2 tiny tubes of coal-ish, herby lanqin. And 10 ml of a sweet syrup, Qiangli pipalu.
Got a great dress there, supercheap as well, it was one of the more modest pieces, black of the shoulder dress with a big picture of Marilyn Monroe wearing a red bandana around her face. I guess I should stay out of Cribs-territory while wearing it.
"Oh shit." I stood and stared at it for a moment, then looked around at the houses of the neighborhood, willing a friendly neighbor out to solve the problem for me...trailer park fashion statement be damned. I have never dealt with this in my life. It was cold. I was in my pajamas. I had no gloves. Even if I KNEW how to change a tire, it would be impossible to do so in this temperature without at least gloves.
25. Sequence 25 (04:30)
December 16 Toronto, ON Phoenix Concert Theatre
The recipe made about 40 cookies, but they weren't all the same size. I made some of them bigger and some of them smaller. The small ones were definitely cuter, or sexier, as my mother puts it. They WERE cuter, because they are all gone. They didn't even last for 12 hours. They were so delicious that we ate almost a half of them before lunch. So I made another batch today, and it made 110 cookies. I covered some of them in sugar, some of them in a mixture of cinnamon and sugar, and some in nonpareils.
Boaz Yakim handles the action and script really well. it’s only that some of the dialog that becomes contrived and forced, but that doesn’t slow down the film at all. The action scenes are, however, really impressive; showing off Statham’s mad skills as an action star and he’s really good at being both formidable and vulnerable at the same time. With his steely stare and narrow eyes, he’s one mean man you don’t want to mess with unless you value your very life. But it’s newcomer Catherine Chan that really shines in her first ever feature-film role. With a wide variety of emotions, she is horribly confused and scared at what’s unfolding before her very eyes. And Reggie Lee is simply good as the villainous lackey to an ever deliciously evil James Hong as crime boss Hang Jiao.
In 1929 Britain, as the colonial power, signed a deal in the name of its colonies giving Egypt almost all of the Nile water and the veto power over its use upstream. In 1959 a revised treaty gave three quarters of the Nile waters to Egypt with Sudan taking the rest.
1-1 Tomutonttu – Samaan Aikaan Toisaalla 9:58
08 Jan 12 – FA Cup – City 2-3 United
You read the headline.
2.) The bride's cousins starting asking who was going to pay for the bridesmaid's dresses? Well, apparently they didn't understand that they were supposed to buy it themselves. There is drama over how many of them now will be part of the wedding now that the dress isn't free for them.
Dies - Dienamic Star trio, Stampin Up Tiny Tags
This is how it was described to me:
Yes, and...?
- Contoured Side Wings for valuable side impact protection
- Anyways, I needed to use up my farmers cheese and this is a "cook book of trial and error" after all :-). And if you want a better recipe check out More than a mount full
French Onion Soup
WASHINGTON…OREGON AND CALIFORNIA.
And the clown car plots
Scrapping and crafting has been on the back burner for me since the end of February due to family illness. I did manage to squeeze in some weekend scrapping a few weeks ago and finally have time to share my layout.
Lucky for me, I found a recipe for Vietnamese daikon and carrot pickles that you can keep in the fridge … I mean … ICEBOX … for weeks totes without a jar or can. You cut carrots and daikon radish into thin matchsticks, massage them with salt and sugar until they release moisture, rinse them off, and then brine them for an hour in a mixture of sugar, white vinegar, and water.
Saturday 11th February
Indispensable bumbles, fluffs and fauna.
The irony here is that physician culture, through the focus on ‘compassion’, has actually enabled this shift. Patients, administrators and the government have noticed that docs actually will sacrifice the self in order to ‘do the right thing’ for the patient. Human nature being what it is, leads patients and administrators to become more aggressive and unreasonable. They see our compassion as weakness and take advantage. Docs have rolled over and been asked to eat feces. We have opened our mouths and said “ahhh”.
What Is The Difference Between A Psychic and a Medium?
Always remember to take time to reflect & enjoy life's simple treasures along the way.
The work is due to commence at the end of May and finished after around five weeks.
Accessories: Simply Scored Scoring Tool, Paper Trimmer, 2 1/2" Scallop Circle Punch, Boho Blossoms Punch
39. When You Reach Me - Stead (2009)
intuitions, being enough
And, you know, I don’t believe the “Internet killed the concept of the album”. Since the very beginning of the music industry, most labels and artists have been focusing on “hits”, filling their albums with one or two great songs and then some unnecessary fillers. By chance, we haven’t been falling that much into this trap in the extreme Metal scene even though it was really a current habit in the 90’s to have really extreme bands, take Napalm Death, i.e., releasing “singles” out of their current releases (think the “Suffer The Children”, “The World Keeps Turning”, “Hung”, “Greed Killing”, etc. EPs).
Other images in the painting come to life – a man rolls a wheel along a path on the hillside. He could easily carry it, but he keeps it rolling. A beautiful woman stands by the road. A man comes and circles round and round her. He admires her. We assume there is lustful thinking going on in his mind. But he does nothing and she does nothing. Children play. Musicians make music and dance. The painting represents life and we see many and various aspects of it.
Because recently he has developed what Ben and I call the 'grunt and heave'. He is so desperate to be on the ground, free to run around and follow his big brother, that he doesn't even let me pick him up, let alone snuggle with me. sniff sniff.
All right. Another thing. Movies. We don't see movies here very often. The ones in the Turkish cinemas are often dubbed and the ones on Base are few and far between. But Hunger Games was coming to the Base this weekend! We even got it organized for a bunch of guys to go one day and a bunch of the gals to go another so no babysitters were needed. I saw Hunger Games on a special date night a few weeks ago, but now I was going again having read the book. (Awesome books by the way but not without controversy!) No big surprise for our Base when John, the movie theatre guy, posted on the website that the movies had not come in from Germany as promised. Bummer!
As someone of you have pointed out, the planned launch party last night didn't happen. I just haven't quite managed to get the place finished. It's all this rain - the decorator couldn't get outside to do the windows. So, you'll have to wait a bit longer to see the fab purple front door and all the trimmings. I hope you don't mind a spot of purple :).
The solution is to go back to the basics and hone the skills you thought you had down pat, then try again. It is totally amazing how easy the advanced stuff becomes after doing that.
The video playing will go automatically to the next video OR you can click thru to YOU TUBE to see the whole page.
I was delighted to have sold several copies of my own books and thought that would mean I would go back with lighter luggage. Instead, my books were replaced by these freebies, but believe me, I ain't grumbling.
I love how she added graphic punch with that color block pillow & geometric rug. Plus I almost passed out from the perfectly pint-sized scale of that lamp! The versatile storage ottoman & the slim profile of the slip-covered Ikea chair fit so ideally into this room. (FYI: I've clocked many hours in our own Ikea chair over the past 4.5 months & I can attest that it's so comfy/functional.)
If you don’t know it, Zits is about 16-year-old Jeremy and his parents. It is spot-on everyday. I think Jerry Scott and Jim Bergman, the strip’s creators, are brilliant writers. In three for four frames they capture what it is like to live with a teenager boy. What does this have to do with writing a novel you ask? A lot can be learned from their ability to tell a story in so little space. Sure, they have the advantage of the drawings to help them, but whenever I am tempted to use six adjectives to describe, let’s say, a good meal, I think of Zits. Wouldn’t one perfect word – like sumptuous – work better? Suddenly a “tasty, delicious, flavorful, yummy, appetizing, and delectable meal” seems bland.
Or can you really walk away from it?
* Secondly please e-mail a brief statement about yourself and any DT experience you have to craftingwhenwecan@gmail.com. If you do not have any DT experience please still enter! We welcome everyone to enter in this call.
I think Connie thinks too much.
to games of distraction
Certain persons have been begging me for the past five years to write about war against the Turks, and encourage our people and stir them up to it, and now that the Turk is actually approaching, my friends are compelling me to do this duty, especially since there are some stupid preachers among us Germans (as I am sorry to hear) who are making the people believe that we ought not and must not fight against the Turks. Some are even so crazy as to say that it is not proper for Christians to bear the temporal sword or to be rulers; also because our German people are such a wild and uncivilized folk that there are some who want the Turk to come and rule. All the blame for this wicked error among the people is laid on Luther and must be called “the fruit of my Gospel,” just as I must bear the blame for the rebellion, and for everything bad that happens anywhere in the world.
Get the details and information you need to get the Las Vegas Condominium of your dreams fast and affordably! You can learn the advantages and benefits of Las Vegas Condo living, and discuss your needs with a knowledgeable professional today!
The next year found Zak bouncing between Kansas City and Pittsburgh, playing just 15 games with the Pirates in 1945 and 21 in 1946. But Frankie made up for lack of playing time with a couple of legendary baseball stories that are still told by oldtimers. The first one takes place sometime in the 1944 season. The Pirates are playing Chicago at Wrigley Field and Frankie is trying to score on a double by outfielder Jim Russell. Rounding third, Zak is shoved by nasty little third baseman Eddie Stanky and an out of control Frankie tumbles all the way to the dugout. The ump waves in the run but neglects to discipline Stanky. Pirates manager Frankie Frisch vows to even the score for Zak and sure enough on the next play Jim Russell comes sliding into third, spikes high, as does manager Frankie Frisch, sliding in spikes high from the coaches box! The ump, Hall Of Famer Jocko Conlan, calls Russell safe and Frisch out of the game.
Sekula, Allan. “Fish Story.” Dismal Science: Photo Works, 1972-1996. Normal: University Galleries, Illinois State University, 1999. 42-54.
23. Hungry nah know bam-by. If you have a need, you grasp at everything that fulfills it.
Leaf Insect Flourish Tree A Sweet Treat Phrase Tag
We had a wonderful time with our Imbolc activities & Celebrations.
The riad is an oasis of peace and quiet and indulgence!
we're counting the days and the money it's left to get this zine finally printed out!
I know that there are people who have difficulty dealing with their medical problems, and are often in denial of how bad their condition really is, but I really had a hard time dealing with this patient. I know that in nursing I am going to encounter all kinds of personalities and I might not agree with people, but my job is to do what's best for them and their care. In this situation, I gave him all the tools he needed to maintain good hygiene, but he refused care. My question is this: why are you in the hospital if you don't want to comply with anything that the doctors and nurses are telling you to do? I will never understand it.
I’ve long suspected that John Smallman’s Saul, who has been saying for many months now that a watershed event will soon happen for many of us, has been speaking not about Ascension but about the transition that Archangel Michael is now announcing. I asked the Boss about this and he confirmed that my suspicion was correct: this transition is the event that Saul has been speaking about.
Top 10 Rocking Rescues
peaceful presence in that!
The report, by French MEP Francoise Castex, calls for immigrants to be given legal rights and access to social welfare provision such as benefits.
Once my friend Rena, her mom, and her sister were all in town, I suggested Dairy Queen. Luckily, they all agreed! I saw Kathleen’s Butterfinger Blizzard sometime last week and it stayed with me. It was the perfect birthday treat.
I think the series should be renamed “Sookie Stackhouse, the Southern Cookbook Chronicles”. Honest to god, there is more detail and description over food and how to waitress–it must’ve been half the book! If I had to read one more page on making blueberry cobbler, I was going to either scream or go to the grocery store.
Although Jesus used this figure of speech, they did not realize what he was trying to tell them.
Pretties by Scott Westerfeld
Chop tomatoes in large chunks - here I used small tomatoes, so merely cut them in half. Place in a small bowl with torn basil leaves. Add salt, pepper and cooled onions. Toss to combine.
Technology just keeps getting sneakier and sneakier!! Recordings that seem to be a real person!! I ask you! I don't know about you, but that sort of thing leaves me feeling duped, foolish, and annoyed! Seriously annoyed!! Unfortunately I hung up before I learned who was calling and why, so I can't even contact them to complain!
+1 sharing a link to this blog post on your Facebook (or you can just hit the share button at the bottom of this post).
Now here is the mom reality check for me… She knew there would be cake after Mass to celebrate. It was announced to the children at rehearsal.. Chocolate cake! Thats all she remembered.. not that there would ALSO be white cake. I am thinking okay, all this preparation to have everything WHITE… and she wants chocolate cake. I wish I could say I am one of those moms who just doesn’t worry about things like that… but…. I do. But, what do you do, it’s her day, not mine… enjoy your chocolate cake love, I just won’t watch (right after I capture the moment!)
After a couple of minutes, flip it onto a plate (you will think it is going to fall apart, but it wont, trust me) then slide back into the pan to cook the other side. When golden and crispy, tip onto a board or plate, slice into wedges and top with the sour cream, avocado and lime.
I was craving chocolate. Hubby wanted cake. I was tired and didn't feel like going to the store to get cocoa. Even though my favorite chocolate cake recipe doesn't have cocoa powder in it I wanted to try something new. I was going to do a pumpkin chocolate marble cake. But I didn't. I was so tired from being at Straits Restaurant the night before and drinking with some friends I really didn't want to be in the kitchen all day baking a cake. Plus I had a slight headache from the Pinot Grigio that I drank. I only had 2 glasses...my days of drinking are seriously over.
You’re no longer my security blanket, my soulmate, my pretend sugar daddy. ‘Cause I’ve learned that even when you go along, I’m the one who always pays.
of colours which it is using for the sign complained of?This Kat has not had time to read the 187 paragraph judgment yet (at the time of posting, it wasn't yet on BAILII but you can read it here), but will return to it tonight unless one or other of his colleagues kindly gets there first and writes the decision up for him.
2 initial
Why can’t it be a state holiday for us too? We actually have a lot of preparing to do.
Anyway, with the exception of the Anex channel. (which to me was a complete waste of my time and effort) I have made all songs previously public and then private; public again. I don't believe you will see me on "America's Most Wanted" or "Dog The Bounty Hunter". If I end up on "Judge Judy", I will ask her why she yells at black people more than white people.
Cindy Coutts was a Featured Artist for Take Ten Magazine, has an upcoming Featured Artist and cover for Stampler's Sampler Magazine, and is currently in several industry magazines.
There’s Bear in them Woods!
Jimi Hendrix is on lead guitar, a fag hanging out of his mouth as he points his finger and waves at Jim Morrison who is dancing topless in the crowd.
Also, I’ve just spent the past weekend on a meditation retreat on a farm in Shropshire. That was really something. Not what I expected, because I didn’t have any expectations. I realised a lot about creativity, flow, growth…
Don’t miss this exciting episode of ‘Weekly Idol’ airing May 2nd.
While the article was meant to inspire the young to seek bigger avenues in life and not give up in their struggle, I have decided to apply it to my now present obsession of getting my weight back on track. Over the last 30 years, I have gained over 10 kgs. So many factors, marriage, children, middle age, and a growing sweet tooth. But the last three kgs beyond the 10 kilos had me on full alert.
“Imagine coming to a comedy club and not being sure if the “comedian” was David Brent or Ricky Gervais.” Analyzed Peter.
This is a wonderfully exciting time in all our lives. 2012 was predicted to be the end of the world. In truth it is simply the end of a calendar created by the Mayans many hundreds of years ago. There is no apocalypse, at least not physically. 2012 signifies a change in human consciousness. Many of us are waking up to our truth and our heritage. We have long felt the pull from our ancestors to remember our true selves, and to reawaken those old cultures and lifestyles. Well, let us do it. If you feel a particular connection with a time period in history, or you have a fascination with faeries, mermaids, dragons or any other supposedly mythical creature or person, now is the time to discover exactly why that is. Live your truth. Be happy.
Friday at sunset, the eight-day celebration of Passover begins.
The novel’s central characters are two siblings, Jaidev and Tara Puri, who live in a small, tightly knit Hindu community in a lane called Bhola Pandhe’s Gali in the old walled city of Lahore. Among the ways in which Yashpal’s novel links the lives and loves of its middle-class characters to the great churning in the public sphere of Lahore and Delhi in the 1940s is by setting them within the overlapping worlds of journalism, literature and education in Lahore (no other Indian novel is so much in love with the idea of the newspaper, and the newspaper’s power as a voice of reason in the public sphere). Puri is an idealistic young writer and journalist who has already served a prison sentence for the cause of the freedom movement. Tara is a college student excited by the intellectual freedom of the university – one that is not available in the world of the gali, with its family and gender hierarchies – but troubled by her engagement to a man she hardly knows.
Plastic yoga mats are a great choice for a beginner, especially if you do not know if yoga is right for you. This is a very affordable option and you can find this type of mat almost anywhere. They come in an assortment of colors and you can find one that suits you perfectly. This mat may not be as comfortable as other mats as they do not provide much cushioning and some people even complain of a weird chemical smell that comes off this type of mat. If you do find that you love yoga and want to participate more often, you may want to go for another mat that is more comfortable.
As the boys are both walking securely, I start to take more "risks" venturing away from home 1 on 2. Here I am at an Easter Hunt with both boys by myself. (My friend Robyn talked me into going!) Neither boy, however, thought this whole bunny idea was very cool.
Teddy bears, doll and dress up clothes,
It was 1:00 in the afternoon, and I’d come 110k that day. It was done. I’d come from Bangalore to Goa by cycle. Bicycle. 635k in four days. I lazed around a bit in the chair and then asked the guy to look after my cycle while I went to the sea for a dip. They had lounge beds laid out under large umbrellas and I went and slept in one of these until it was time for mum’s flight.
Tonight, I can't stop thinking about & praying for a friend from college, Heather.
At least compared to - well, YOU know.
Friday night after everyone had finished setting up, we spent hanging around the camp site – drinking, talking, & playing card games.
First up was a trade with Weston over at Fantastic Catch. He posted a Blue Refractor Joe Panik Auto from last year's Bowman Chrome. The beautiful card is serial numbered 086/150. Panik as a 2011 1st round draft choice of the Giants and batted .341 last year in low A ball. He had 6 HRs, 54 RBI and 13 SBs in 69 games, a pretty solid start. This year he is struggling a bit in high A, hitting under .240 but he is still considered a top prospect. With the Giants horrific play (Brandon Crawford is hitting about .220 with 6 errors already) at SS, Panik can't develop and get to the majors quick enough.
And when I am struck by feelings of lack of self worth I am reminded that of 6 billion people on this planet, I was one of the lucky one's that got to sit at this beings feet.
A nation is a soul, a spiritual principle. Two things, which in truth are but one, constitute this soul or spiritual principle. One lies in the past, one in the present. One is the possession in common of a rich legacy of memories; the other is present-day consent, the desire to live together, the will to perpetuate the value of the heritage that one has received in an undivided form. Man, Gentlemen, does not improvise. The nation, like the individual, is the culmination of a long past of endeavours, sacrifice, and devotion. Of all cults, that of the ancestors is the most legitimate, for the ancestors have made us what we are.
Leo di San Felice is a very jazzy, swing, fun piano-cabaret Italian artist. He was discovered by Renzo Arbore and played in Arbore’s music shows. His songs are definitely unique, fun and catchy. While playing he’s always surrounded by soft-toys and pink desk lamps, colorful pillows and lots of pink everywhere. He seems to be living in his own world, but he fits in so perfectly and through comedy he is magically able to bring us to this world, and I guarantee you, it’s so much fun! He played also at the Umbria Jazz Festival, one of the most important jazz festivals in the world that has been held annually since 1973, usually in the month of July in Perugia, Italy. Renzo Arbore has also been one of the Jazz Festival’s directors and artists such as B. B. King and other great jazz musicians have participated to write down the history of jazz.
Biscottis are just double baked bread. They are quite healthy as there is almost no oil or butter on them. They last for weeks and you can play around with different ingredients. All advantages.
But wait! Don’t forget to add a dash of dimethylpolysiloxane, an anti-foaming agent made of silicone that is also used in Silly Putty and cosmetics.
Once you accept the adapted bulk of oil barrels for a world, columnist X to accompany up Blue who will fly you to the abstruse level.
Here is why:
4. Golden Valley Brewery McMinnville Red Thistle Quercus Pinot oak barrel aged red/ESB Not overpowering pinot flavor and definitely different. Enjoyed. Contrast to the nasty bourbon aged beer below (see under yuck).
Wow, it's been awhile since I posted on my blog! Double ugh! There are so many reasons and at the same time no reasons why I have not! ;) I think it was just a necessary break. 2011 was the year of medical issues in my family, a year we moved, a year we expanded our business and a year that seemed to hold many challenges. So, I greet 2012 with open arms and excitement! I plan on being back to posting on my blog on a pretty regular basis, sharing what I create, sharing some video's, sharing some svg files and I guess just sharing a part of me. My hope for both you and I in 2012 is that this year will bring you much happiness and health!
Dec 5th – is thankful for a man who spends 15 mins at a roadside market to find me some oranges (for my cold), only to return to the truck with green/yellow little fruit :)
Let me begin by saying that, while it does pay the bills, my husband's job is not terribly intellectually stimulating. So, although Gerry is an excellent employee (she subtly reminds his boss, in case he happens to read this), there are times when he needs to engage in a little... extracurricular activity, to keep himself awake and prevent boredom-induced insanity from inciting him to jam something pointy in his eye.
Tomorrow, Marianne would dress, say a pleasant goodbye, and go about her life. Leaving me with little more than a memory. I breathed in her essence among the heavy hotel air, hoping to retain some semblance of her. Something I could recall when times were not so pleasant.
Later that day at sunset an Alien Space Ship arrived with two smaller
It is because: - I do not share Obama’s vision or value system for America;
So Noxxy isn't gone, just exhausted and waiting for the crush to ease so we can all get back to fighting the good fight.
It was 9:00 am and the department was empty except for the librarians. We were the only patrons. We found a corner and settled in until one of the staff came over and informed us that the children’s room was reserved for people “accompanying children.” She was a little apologetic, and explained that it would get busy and loud shortly and there were plenty of other, quieter places for us to work in the library. (True.)
